 Three (3) MCDS Capstone courses (11-634, 11-635 and 11-632) (36 units) 
 One (1) Elective: any graduate level course 600 and above in the School of 
Computer Science (12 units) 
 
3.3.6.2 Common MCDS Core Courses 
All MCDS students are required to complete four common core courses in their first two 
semesters: 
 10-601 - Machine Learning 
 15-619 - Cloud Computing 
 05-839 - Interactive Data Science 
 11-631 - Data Science Seminar 
 
3.3.6.3 Areas of Concentration 
In addition to the common MCDS core, all students must complete at least one area of 
concentration, which consists of three courses in Analytics, Systems, or Human-
Centered Data Science. Students consult with their academic advisor and choose one or 
more areas of concentration during their first semester, in preparation for enrolling in 
Spring classes. 
 
 
 Analytics concentration: 
o One (1) Machine Learning course 
o One (1) Software Systems course 
o One (1) big data course 
 Systems concentration: 
o 15-513 Introduction to Computer Systems (elective, prerequisite for many 
advanced Systems courses) 
o Three (3) systems project courses 
 Human-Centered Data Science concentration: 
o One (1) Methods course 
o Two (2) HCI courses  
 16 
A detailed list of courses satisfying each concentration is contained in the MCDS Program 
FAQ. 
 
3.3.6.4 MCDS Capstone Courses 
All MCDS students complete three Capstone courses: 
 11-634 - Capstone Planning Seminar (12 units) 
 11-635 - Capstone Research (12 units) 
 11-632 - Data Science Capstone (12 units) 
 
MCDS Program Learning Outcomes  
 
 Design, implement and evaluate the use of analytic algorithms on sample 
datasets.  
 Explain how a machine-learning model is developed for and evaluated on real 
world datasets. 
 Design and execute experimental data collection and present resulting analyses 
using appropriate user experience (UX) techniques including interactive data 
visualizations. 
 Apply and customize analytics, systems and human-centered data science 
techniques to application-specific data science requirements and objectives. 
 Identify tradeoffs among data science techniques (analytics, systems and/or 
human-centered) and contrast design alternatives, within the context of specific 
data science application domains. 
 Survey, interpret and comparatively criticize state of the art research talks and 
papers, with emphasis on constructive improvements. 
 Organize, execute, report on, and present a real world data science project in 
collaboration with other researchers/programmers. 
 
Depending on the concentration, additional learning outcomes are emphasized: 
 
Analytics.  Students electing to complete the Analytics concentration will also learn to:  
 
 Design, implement and evaluate a software system and machine-learning model 
on real world datasets at real world scale.  
 Analyze and document data science requirements in different application 
domains and survey as well as critique state of the art solutions for those 
requirements. 
 
Systems.  Students electing to complete the Systems concentration will also learn to:  
  
 17 Implement and evaluate complex, scalable data science systems, with emphasis 
on providing experimental evidence for design decisions. 
 Anticipate and avert structural and/or implementation problems with systems 
design, especially with scaling and tail distributions. 
 
HCDS. Students electing to complete the Human-Centered Data Science (HCDS) 
concentration will also learn to:  
 
 Design, implement and evaluate a user experience prototype to allow for clear 
understanding of data science solutions. 
 Apply social and behavioral research methods to data science problems to 
understand the human aspects of data collection and analysis. 
  
Throughout their coursework, students will take introductory courses on all those topics, 
practice them in advanced courses and seminars and demonstrate all learned skills in 
their Capstone project and internship. Students are encouraged to choose elective 
courses in the curriculum according to their professional goals and mastery of the main 
subjects.  
 
3.3.10 Capstone project 
The capstone project consists of students working in a team or individually on a project. 
The capstone project integrates the educational experience of the student. A capstone 
project is typically a CMU research project, or an industry sponsored project; 
occasionally students define capstone topics through communication with the faculty. 
Students interested in defining their own capstone topics should discuss with the MCDS 
faculty as early as possible. The capstone project is a great opportunity for a student (or 
student team) to “show off” their unique skills and accomplishments. Capstone projects 
have been instrumental in the hiring decisions for several employers. 
 
 
3.3.11 Elective courses 
Electives can be any graduate level course (numbered 600 or above) in the School of 
Computer Science. Students use their elective courses to enhance study in an area of 
interest or to explore new areas of interest. 
3.3.12 Undergraduate courses 
Undergraduate courses are taken to address an area of weakness in the student’s prior 
preparation. Undergraduate courses (numbered less than or equal to 599) may be taken 
pass/fail or for credit but do not count toward the 144 units of eligible study: The course 
and course grade will appear on the student’s transcript, and the course grade will factor 
as part of the student’s QPA.  
 183.3.13 Independent study course 
Independent study courses allow students to cover study of a particular area of interest, 
and are used when no formal course is available in a given subject area. Students who are 
interested in continuing to a Ph.D. degree often enroll in Independent Study, since it 
offers the opportunity to perform research directly with a faculty member. Independent 
study courses are considered electives. 
 
Each independent study course must be advised and approved by at least one faculty 
member. Agreement to supervise an independent study course is purely voluntary on the 
part of the faculty member. It is the duty of the student, therefore, to negotiate the terms 
and conditions of the independent study with the pertinent faculty members of CMU who 
will be supervising the study. These individuals are referred to as “independent study 
supervisors.” Once the student finds someone who agrees to supervise such a course, 
he/she must: 
 
 
1. Students wishing to take an independent study must request approval from their 
academic advisor and complete proposal before the first day of classes in a given 
semester: 
2. Enter into an agreement with the independent study supervisor that includes 
course expectations, including deliverables. 
3. Secure the “Independent Study Contract Form” from the MCDS administrator. 
4. Complete the form, provide a brief description of the work to be done, including 
deliverables and how they will be graded. 
5. Secure signatures of both the student and the supervisor. Return the form to the 
MCDS administrator in order to obtain approval for the independent study from the 
Director. 
 
Independent study contracts must be submitted no later than on the last day of the first 
week of classes in a given semester. 
3.3.14 Double counting courses 
No course may be used to complete two MCDS degree requirements, nor may a course 
satisfy requirements in two degree programs. 
3.3.15 Courses outside of the School of Computer Science 
Elective courses in other Schools at Carnegie Mellon may be taken with prior permission 
of the Director. 
3.3.16 Grades 
All courses offered by the SCS CMU are graded on the 4.3 grading standard  
http://www.cmu.edu/policies/documents/Grades.html.  MCDS students must maintain a 
3.0 overall average each semester to remain in good standing. A student must obtain a B- 
or better grade in all courses, which count towards core requirements. If a student  
 19receives a C- or better, that course may count as an elective towards the degree 
requirements. All courses must receive a letter grade; courses taken pass/fail do not 
count towards the MCDS degree. 
 
Enrollment Services is the only University office that can provide an official letter of 
enrollment, official transcript and enrollment verification. Enrollment verification can 
be requested online through The HUB at: https://www.cmu.edu/hub/registrar/student-
records/verifications/  
3.3.17 Student Review, Academic Probation and Academic Actions 
The MCDS program conducts an academic progress review at the conclusion of each 
semester in order to monitor individual student progress towards graduation regarding 
the fulfillment of curricular requirements, course grades, and academic integrity. Should 
a student’s effort fall below the acceptable level of academic performance and/or fail to 
meet standards and policies established by Carnegie Mellon University, the student may 
be dismissed from the program. 
 
Infractions  
 
After each academic progress review, each student will receive a letter indicating the 
result of the review and their standing in the program. If applicable, the letter will also 
note the following infractions by the student in the given semester: 
 Cumulative QPA is below 3.0, resulting in the student being put on Academic 
Probation  (see below) 
 Cumulative QPA is below 2.6, resulting in academic probation or possible 
dismissal (see below) 
 Academic Integrity Violation (AIV) deemed an infraction by the MCDS committee 
(see 3.7.2) 
 
Minimum QPA and Academic Probation  
 
Students must maintain a cumulative QPA of 3.0 to remain in good standing with the 
program. Should a student’s overall QPA drop below 3.0 during any given semester, 
he/she will be placed on academic probation  for the following semester. In probation 
cases, the student will be required to 
 enroll in courses as advised by the academic advisor,  
 improve his/her grades to no less than an overall 3.0 QPA in the following 
semester, and  
 meet any other goal set by the advisor during that period (e.g., fulfilling a core 
course requirement).  
If a student’s cumulative QPA drops below 2.6, the student will be considered at risk of 
being unable to complete the program and will be considered for dismissal. He/she will 
be required to meet the program director to discuss his/her situation. Only if, after that 
meeting, the MCDS program committee ascertains that the student is likely to complete  
 20the remaining program requirements in the allotted time, the student will be allowed to 
continue his/her studies in MCDS, and dismissed otherwise. If the student is allowed to 
continue their studies, they will be placed on academic probation for the following 
semester and is subject to the requirements above. 
 
Dismissal  
 
A student may be dismissed from the program for any of the following cases: 
 If the student has been put on academic probation and failed to meet the remedial 
requirements set by the advisor in the following semester, or committed an 
Academic Integrity Violation deemed an infraction by the MCDS committee while 
on academic probation 
 If the student has a cumulative QPA of 2.6 or lower and the MCDS program 
committee does not ascertain that the student is likely to complete the remaining 
program requirements in the allotted time 
 If the student has committed two Academic Integrity Violation deemed infractions 
by the MCDS committee (see 3.7.2) 
 If the student has committed an Academic Integrity Violation infraction where the 
violation is deemed to be sufficiently egregious as determined by the MCDS 
program committee 
 If the student has been found to infringe a University Policy, where such 
infringement is deemed grounds for dismissal 
 
Students who realize that one of these situations may apply to them are strongly 
encouraged to meet with the academic advisor to discuss a plan to mitigate the situation. 
Students who find they are struggling in the program will have the best chances of success 
if they communicate early and often with the academic advisor. 
 
3.3.18 Incomplete grades 
Carnegie Mellon University students are expected to complete a course during the 
academic semester in which the course was taken. However, if the instructor agrees, a 
grade of “I” (incomplete) may be given when a student has been unable to complete the 
work of a course. However, the work completed up to that date must be of passing quality 
and the grade of incomplete provides no undue advantage to that student over other 
students. 
 
By awarding an “I” grade, an instructor must specify the requirements for the completion 
of the work and designate a default letter grade in the event that the student fails to 
complete the remaining work. 
 
Students must complete the required course work by no later than the end of the 
following academic semester or sooner if required by the instructor. 
  
 21The instructor must record the permanent course grade by the last day of the 
examination period of the following semester, or the Registrar will automatically assign 
the default grade. 
 
If further work has not been completed after one semester and a default grade is 
rendered, the default grade will become the grade of record. 
3.3.19 Change of grades and missing grades 
If a grade has been assigned in error, it can be changed to a different permanent grade. 
The procedure for changing a grade is as follows: 
 Discuss the matter with the course instructor; provide evidence that the grade issued 
was not the grade earned. 
 If the instructor agrees, the student should contact the program administrator to 
process a Change of Grade Form in order to correct the grade that was issued in error. 
Generally, the instructor is the final authority for a course grade. 
 If a grade has not been assigned, please notify the course instructor for the 
completion of a Missing Grade Form. 
3.3.20 Qualifying examinations and procedures (or equivalent) 
None required. 
3.3.21 Thesis/dissertation 
None required. 
3.3.22 On transfer to another program 
If the requirements for the MCDS degree have not been completed when a student leaves 
to pursue another academic program, the degree will not be awarded. Completion of the 
MCDS degree does not guarantee admission into any doctoral degree program at 
Carnegie Mellon University. The courses that will be completed as part of the MCDS may 
serve to enhance one’s application to these programs but will in no way insure 
admittance. 
3.3.23 Intellectual property policy 
The MCDS degree program adheres to Carnegie Mellon University policy on intellectual 
property: http://www.cmu.edu/policies/documents/IntellProp.html  
3.3.24 Teaching requirements 
None required. However, students are encouraged to apply for teaching assistant 
positions in courses where they have excelled. 
3.3.25 Language proficiency requirements 
None required. However, non-native English speakers are encouraged to take advantage 
of the various support functions provided by the Intercultural Communication Center 
(ICC) and the Global Communication Center (GCC).  
 223.3.26 Academic Integrity and Policies on Plagiarism and Cheating 
The university considers any form of cheating or plagiarism to be a serious violation of 
student ethics. The student is required to understand and rigorously follow only the 
permitted forms of collaboration as defined by the instructor in every class. The work 
you submit must be your own, unless you have clearly attributed it to others. You must 
not use the work of others without proper citation. And, you must not use resources, 
including other persons, except as authorized by the course or project for which you are 
submitting the work. Such conduct might be accepted or commonplace elsewhere, but it 
is not here. Be careful. Be warned. Failure to abide by these rules, even just once, can 
result in your permanent separation from the University without refund of money paid. 
Note that the policy requires the student to be informed and understand the academic 
integrity rules for every assignment or exam in a course. 
 
The MCDS program strives to produce graduates with the highest standards of academic 
integrity. Academic Integrity Violations are taken very seriously and the MCDS program 
has a zero tolerance policy for multiple Academic Integrity Violations. A single violation 
is grounds for dismissal from the graduate program if deemed sufficiently egregious as 
determined by the MCDS program committee. If a student commits a second violation, 
the expected penalty is dismissal from the graduate program (see also academic progress 
review at section 3.3.17). 
 
Please review the University Policy on Academic Integrity: 
https://www.cmu.edu/policies/student-and-student-life/academic-integrity.html   
The policy includes the University expectations around academic integrity and 
provides definitions of cheating, plagiarism, and unauthorized assistance. 
 
A review of the University’s Academic Disciplinary Actions procedures 
https://www.cmu.edu/student-affairs/theword/academic-discipline/index.html   is also 
recommended. These procedures outline the process for investigating, reporting, and 
adjudicating violations of the University Policy on Academic Integrity. The procedures 
also outline the appeal process. 
 
3.3.27 Process for Appealing Final Grades  
https://www.cmu.edu/student-affairs/theword/academic/appeal-of-grades-and-academic-actions.html  
 
Final grades will be changed only in exceptional circumstances and only with the 
approval of the instructor and the department, unit or program. Grading is a matter of 
sound discretion of the instructor and final grades are rarely changed without the consent 
of the instructor who assigned the grade. The following circumstances are the unusual 
exceptions that may warrant a grade appeal: (a) the final grade assigned for a course is 
based on manifest error (e.g. a clear error such as arithmetic error in computing a grade 
or failure to grade one of the answers on an exam), or (b) the faculty or staff member who 
assigned the grade did so in violation of a University policy.  
 233.3.27 Teaching Assistants 
The MCDS degree does not have a teaching requirement. However, some students may 
wish to be a teaching assistant. MCDS students may petition for approval to TA up to one 
course per semester provided that they are in good academic standing (Overall QPA 3.0 
or above). 
 
As required by the English Fluency in Higher Education Act of 1990, graduate students 
are required to have a certain level of fluency in English before they can instruct in 
Pennsylvania. Through this Act, all institutions of higher education in the state are 
required to evaluate and certify the English fluency of all instructional personnel, 
including teaching assistants and interns. 
 
The full university policy can be reviewed at: 
 
http://www.cmu.edu/policies/faculty/evaluation-certification-english-fluency-
instructors.html . 
 
In addition to administering the International Teaching Assistant (ITA) Test (mandatory 
screening test for any non-native speaker of English), Language Support in the Student 
Academic Success Center helps teaching assistants who are non-native English speakers 
develop fluency and cultural understanding to teach successfully at Carnegie Mellon. 
Visit the website for additional information: https://www.cmu.edu/student-success/  
3.3.28 Internship Requirement and Search for Full Time Employment 
An internship is required for the degree program. In some cases, when a student has 
prior work experience, the Director of the degree program may waive this requirement. 
Students start searching for internships generally in the Fall and Spring semesters. Once 
the student returns from an internship in the Fall, they should immediately begin the 
search for full time employment. Extensive resources are available at 
http://www.cmu.edu/career/  including a resume submission system, a list of employers, 
on campus interviews and mock interviews, and many other resources. 
 
The Technical Opportunities Conference (TOC) 
http://engineering.cmu.edu/companies/toc/  occurs every September. This conference is 
one of the main recruiting events each year. 
 
All international students are required to apply for Curricular Practical Training (CPT). 
CPT is employment that is an integral part of an established curriculum and is directly 
related to the student’s major area of study. Please visit the Office of International 
Education (OIE) link below to learn more about the CPT process: 
http://www.cmu.edu/oie/forstu/jobs.html   
  
 243.4 Enrollment Verification 
Enrollment Services is the only University office that can provide an official letter of 
enrollment, official transcript and enrollment verification. Enrollment verification can 
be requested online through The HUB via this link: 
http://www.cmu.edu/hub/transcripts/verifications/enrollment.html  
 
 
3.5 University Policies on Grades and Grading 
3.6.1 University Policy on Grades 
This policy offers details concerning university grading principles for students taking 
courses and covers the specifics of assigning and changing grades, grading options, 
drop/withdrawals and course repeats. It also defines the undergraduate and graduate 
grading standards. 
 
You can review the university grading policies here: 
https://www.cmu.edu/policies/student-and-student-life/grading.html   
3.6.2 University Policy on Grades for Transfer Courses 
Carnegie Mellon University offers students the opportunity to take courses for credit 
through a cross-registration program (see Pittsburgh Council on Higher Education 
(PCHE) and Cross-registration below) and through the receipt of transfer credit from 
other accredited institutions. The Carnegie Mellon University transcript will include 
information on such courses as follows: Carnegie Mellon courses and courses taken 
through the university’s cross-registration program will have grades recorded on the 
transcript and be factored into the QPA. All other courses will be recorded on this 
transcript indicating where the course was taken, but without grades. Such courses will 
not be taken into account for academic actions, honors or QPA calculations. (Note: 
suspended students may take courses elsewhere; however, they may receive transfer 
credit only if their college’s and department’s policies allow this.) 
 
You can review the university policy here: 
https://www.cmu.edu/policies/student-and-student-life/transfer-credit-evaluation-and-
assignment.html   
 
3.6 Academic Integrity 
3.7.1 Expectations Regarding Proper Conduct 
In the midst of self-exploration, the high demands of a challenging academic 
environment can create situations where some students have difficulty exercising good 
judgment. Academic challenges can provide many opportunities for high standards to 
evolve if students actively reflect on these challenges and if the community supports  
 25discussions to aid in this process. It is the responsibility of the entire community to 
establish and maintain the integrity of our university.  
 
Carnegie Mellon University educates its students to become professionals who will serve 
society with integrity. The university also creates and disseminates new knowledge and 
expressions of knowledge in ways that benefit society. Carnegie Mellon strives to serve 
the changing needs of society through the three primary goals outlined in its mission 
statement: to create and disseminate knowledge and art through research and artistic 
expression, teaching and learning and transfer to society, to serve students by teaching 
them leadership and problem-solving skills, and the values of quality, ethical behavior, 
responsibility to society and commitments to work, to pursue the advantages provided by 
a diverse community, open to the exchange of ideas, where discovery and artistic 
creativity can flourish. 
 
In any presentation, creative, artistic or research, it is the ethical responsibility of each 
student to identify the conceptual sources of the work submitted. Failure to do so is 
dishonest and is the basis for a charge of cheating or plagiarism, which is subject to 
disciplinary action.  
 
Please review the University Policy on Academic Integrity 
(https://www.cmu.edu/policies/student-and-student-life/academic-integrity.html ). The 
policy includes the University expectations around academic integrity and provides 
definitions of cheating, plagiarism, and unauthorized assistance. 
 
A review of the University’s Academic Disciplinary Actions procedures 
(https://www.cmu.edu/student-affairs/theword/academic-discipline/index.html ) is also 
recommended. These procedures outline the process for investigating, reporting, and 
adjudicating violations of the University Policy on Academic Integrity. The procedures 
also outline the appeal process. 
 
3.7.2 Protocol for Academic Integrity Violations 
The university has a very clear and specific protocol for responding to alleged violations 
of academic integrity. Carnegie Mellon's Academic Disciplinary Actions Overview for 
Graduate Students describes procedures and the appeal process for disciplinary actions 
against graduate students in cases of alleged academic integrity violation. 
 
For more information on disciplinary actions please see: 
 
https://www.cmu.edu/student-
affairs/theword/acad_standards/creative/disciplinary.html  
 
Further documentation on how to respond to an allegation of a violation as a graduate 
student:  
 26 
https://www.cmu.edu/student-affairs/ocsi/academic-integrity/grads.html   
 
Important Note: MCDS implements the above policy’s option of “conven[ing] a 
disciplinary hearing according to the procedures of the department/program”. We have 
adopted the following hearing procedure and “two strikes” rule: 
 If an instructor determines that an academic integrity violation has occurred, 
both the instructor and students are given the opportunity to explain the situation 
to the MCDS program committee. A written hearing by email suffices for this 
purpose. 
 The program committee then reviews all information and decides whether the 
violation is deemed an infraction (see 3.3.17), and which secondary actions are to 
be taken on the program level. 
 Two-Strike-Rule: MCDS may dismiss students upon a first AIV infraction. A 
second infraction will always lead to the offending student being dismissed from 
the program, with no exceptions. 
 
The MCDS program reserves the right to withdraw a degree even though it has been 
granted should there be discovery that the work upon which it was based or the academic 
records in support of it had been falsified. In such a case, the degree will be withdrawn 
promptly upon discovery of the falsification. The complete reference to this university 
policy is available at:  https://www.cmu.edu/policies/student-and-student-
life/withdrawal-of-a-degree.html  
4 Academic Policies 
4.1 MCDS Academic Policies 
4.1.1 Duration of Study 
MCDS students enrolled for full-time studies are normally expected to complete the 
degree in three semesters (16 months). This includes a summer internship. 
4.1.2 Double-Dipping 
A Masters student who uses courses taken as part of another degree program (at 
Carnegie Mellon or elsewhere) toward their program requirements cannot use those 
same courses toward any other M.S. degree offered by the School of Computer Science 
without prior approval. 
4.1.3 Pass/Fail and Audit Grades 
Pass/fail and audit grades are not permitted for courses used to satisfy a degree 
requirement. Graduate students who are required to take additional undergraduate 
courses to build up the core foundations of computer science may not elect the pass/fail 
or audit option for these courses.  
 274.1.4 Transfer Credit 
An equivalent graduate course previously completed at Carnegie Mellon, or another 
institution, may be permitted to satisfy one of the MCDS course requirements, with 
permission from the Director. Students must petition for transfer credit by providing 
the Program Director with the prior course syllabus and other details that may be 
required by the Director in order to make a decision. See the section on “Definition of 
transfer credit versus course exemption”. NOTE: In all cases, credit may only be 
transferred from another degree program for courses deemed “free electives” - i.e., 
courses which were not used to satisfy a core requirement or total units requirement in 
a prior degree program. 
 
All MS students are required to take a minimum of 96 units of coursework at CMU. 
4.1.5 External Internships and Job Interviewing 
MCDS students are expected to attain an external internship during the summer. 
International students must coordinate carefully with the University, due to visa 
restrictions. International students are required to consult with the Office of 
International Education for eligibility before seeking an internship/co-op or signing an 
offer contract. 
 
We caution all students to be aware of potential intellectual property (IP) implications 
with internships, and to review any IP agreements with their academic advisor before 
signing them. It is possible to lose ownership of your own inventions if they occur during 
an external internship. 
 
While it is necessary for students to travel off-campus for job interviews, it is not 
acceptable for a student to miss a course requirement or a capstone project commitment 
due to interview travel. Students should work proactively with prospective employers to 
arrange interview travel in a way that minimizes the impact on their final semester 
course work. 
4.1.6 Transferring into the MCDS Program 
Direct transfers into the MCDS program are not permitted. Students who are currently 
enrolled at Carnegie Mellon who wish to transfer into the MCDS program must do so by 
applying to the MCDS program via the normal admissions process. As specified in Sec. 
4.1.4 in this document, some transfer credit and/or exemption from MCDS requirements 
may be possible on a case-by-case basis. 
4.1.7 Transferring Out of the MCDS Program 
The MCDS program does not prevent students from transferring to another degree 
program. Each degree program has its own rules about whether and when transfers into 
the program are permitted. A student that is interested in transferring out of the MCDS 
degree program should consult the handbook and Program Director of the desired  
 28degree program to learn whether transfers are permitted, and if so, how and when to 
request such a transfer. 
4.1.8 Statute of Limitations 
https://www.cmu.edu/policies/student-and-student-life/masters-students-statute-of- 
limitations.html   
 
As outlined in the Master’s Students Statute of Limitations (link above), students will 
complete all requirements for the master’s degree within a maximum of seven years 
from original matriculation as a master’s student, or less if required by a more restrictive 
department, school or college policy. Once this time-to-degree limit has lapsed, the 
person may resume work towards a master’s degree only if newly admitted to a currently 
offered master’s degree program under criteria determined by that program. 
 
Under extraordinary circumstances, such as leave of absence, military or public service, 
family or parental leave, or temporary disability, a school or college may, upon the 
relevant department's recommendation and with the written approval of the dean (or 
designate), defer the lapse for a period commensurate with the duration of that 
interruption. Students who are pursuing a master’s degree as part-time students for all 
semesters of their program, as approved by their program, may also appeal to their 
program or department for extension of the time to degree limit. 
4.2 LTI Academic Policies 
4.2.1 “Grandfather” policy 
A student can graduate under the policies in effect at the time that the student entered 
the program; or, at the student's choice, the student can graduate under policies that are 
adopted after the student entered the program. In unusual cases, the Director may 
approve exceptions to the program requirements. 
4.2.2 Course Drop/Add/withdrawal procedures 
Students taking undergraduate and Master’s level courses must follow the procedures and 
deadlines for adding, dropping, or withdrawing from courses as identified on the 
academic calendar. Information can be found at: 
 https://www.cmu.edu/hub/registrar/course-changes/index.html . 
 
There is a separate calendar for masters level courses.  
 
4.2.3 Courses with restricted enrollment 
MCDS students have priority for the program core courses. The MCDS program 
administrators cannot intercede with other departments to secure seats for its students 
in other courses as all departments reserve seats for their accepted students. Usually all 
remaining open seats are assigned on a first- come, first-served basis.  Students can,  
 29on occasion, contact the assigned course instructor in order to plead his/her case for 
admission to the course. Admission may be granted at the discretion of the instructor. 
The policy of the department offering the course(s) is always followed. 
4.2.4 Definition of transfer credit versus course exemption 
The LTI may grant transfer credit or issue an exemption for equivalent graduate courses 
previously completed at another institution. This decision rests with the Director of the 
particular program. If a student is exempt from a required course due to prior courses or 
experience, the student can replace that course with an open elective. The student does 
not receive credit for the external course but can take any course that could normally 
count toward the degree in its place. If a student receives credit for prior coursework 
completed at CMU or elsewhere, the student receives that many units of credit, and the 
total amount of required coursework is reduced by that amount. 
4.2.5 External Employment/Consulting 
Since the MCDS program places heavy demands on student time, external employment 
and/or consulting are strongly discouraged. Exceptional students who wish to consult 
should discuss this with their advisor. International students must also have approval in 
advance from the Office of International Education (OIE) for any outside employment. 
4.2.6 Leave of Absence 
A student in good standing may be granted a LOA of at most 1 year, upon written request 
to the Program Director and with consent of the student's advisor. It is the responsibility 
of the student on LOA to contact the program administrator to apply for a return to the 
program. 
4.2.7 Withdrawal from Program 
Students may voluntarily withdraw from the MCDS program. If a student decides to 
withdraw, or is considering a withdrawal, she/he should contact the program 
administrator to schedule an advising meeting as soon as possible.  
 
The university’s general withdrawal policy can be found here: 
 
https://www.cmu.edu/hub/registrar/leaves-and-withdrawals/   
4.2.8 Satisfactory Progress 
If a student does not make satisfactory progress each semester toward completing the 
degree, the LTI may remove the student from the program. See section on “End of 
Semester Evaluation”. In particular, students in the three-semester program who fail one 
of their first-semester MCDS core required courses are strongly encouraged to consider 
switching to the four-semester program. 
4.2.9 Winter and Summer Breaks  
 30Students supported by research projects or working in an on-campus internship are 
expected to remain on campus working during breaks in classes. A two-week vacation is 
typically allowed in the summer for the students who are working on campus (not 
pursuing an external internship). Supported students should arrange their winter break 
time with their supervisor. 
 
4.3 CMU Academic Policies  
4.3.1 Assistance for Individuals with Disabilities  
http://www.cmu.edu/education-office/disability-resources/   
The Office of Disability Resources at Carnegie Mellon University has a continued mission 
to provide physical, digital, and programmatic access to ensure that students with 
disabilities have equal access to their educational experience. We work to ensure that 
qualified individuals receive reasonable accommodations as guaranteed by the 
Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) and Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973. 
Students who would like to receive accommodations can begin the process through 
Disability Resources' secure online portal  
(https://rainier.accessiblelearning.com/cmu/ ) or email access@andrew.cmu.edu to 
begin the interactive accommodation process. 
 
Students with physical, sensory, cognitive, or emotional disabilities are encouraged to 
self-identify with the Office of Disability Resources and request needed accommodations. 
Any questions about the process can be directed to access@andrew.cmu.edu, or call (412) 
268-6121. 
4.3.2 Summary of Graduate Student Appeal and Grievance Procedures  
Graduate students will find the Summary of Graduate Student Appeal and Grievance 
Procedures on the Graduate Education Resource webpage. This document summarizes 
processes available to graduate students who seek review of academic and non-academic 
issues. Generally, graduate students are expected to seek informal resolution of all 
concerns within the applicable department, unit or program before invoking formal 
processes. When an informal resolution cannot be reached, however, a graduate student 
who seeks further review of the matter is to follow the formal procedures outlined here. 
These appeal and grievance procedures shall apply to students in all graduate programs 
of the University. Students should refer to the department specific information in this 
handbook for department and college information about the administration and 
academic policies of the program.  
 
You can review a summary of the university’s graduate student’s appeal and grievance 
procedures here: 
https://www.cmu.edu/graduate/policies/appeal-grievance-procedures.html  
4.3.3 Safeguarding Educational Equity: Sexual Harassment and Sexual Assault   
 31The University prohibits sex-based discrimination, sexual harassment, sexual assault, 
dating/ domestic violence and stalking. The University also prohibits retaliation against 
individuals who bring forward such concerns or allegations in good faith. The 
University’s Sexual Misconduct Policy is available at 
https://www.cmu.edu/policies/administrative-and-governance/sexual-
misconduct/index.html . 
 
The University’s Policy Against Retaliation is available at: 
https://www.cmu.edu/policies/administrative-and-governance/whistleblower.html   
 
If you have been impacted by any of these issues, you are encouraged to 
make contact with any of the following resources: 
 Office of Title IX Initiatives: http://www.cmu.edu/title-ix/ , 412-268-7125, 
tix@cmu.edu 
 University Police: https://www.cmu.edu/police/ , 412-268-2323 
 Additional resources and information can be found at: 
https://www.cmu.edu/title-ix/resources-and-information/index.html   
 
4.3.4 Consensual Intimate Relationship Policy Regarding Undergraduate Students  
 
https://www.cmu.edu/policies/student-and-student-life/consensual-relationships.html   
 
This policy addresses the circumstances in which romantic, sexual or amorous 
relationships/interactions with undergraduate students, even if consensual, are 
inappropriate and prohibited. The purpose of this policy is to assure healthy 
professional relationships. This policy is not intended to discourage consensual 
intimate relationships unless there is a conflicting professional relationship in which 
one party has authority over the other as in the policy. 
4.3.5 Gestational and Parental Accommodations  
https://www.cmu.edu/graduate/programs-services/maternity-accommodation-
protocol.html    
 
Students whose anticipated delivery date is during the course of the semester may 
consider taking time away from their coursework and/or research responsibilities. Any 
student who gives birth to a child while engaged in coursework or research is eligible to 
take either a short-term absence or formal leave of absence. Students are encouraged to 
consult with relevant university faculty and staff as soon as possible as they begin 
making plans regarding time away. 
 Students must contact the Office of the Dean of Student Affairs to register for 
Maternity Accommodations. Students will complete an information form and 
meet with a member of the Dean’s Office staff to determine resources and 
procedures appropriate for the individual student.  
 32o Planning for the student’s discussion with appropriate academic contact(s) 
(advisor, associate dean, etc.) may be reviewed during this meeting. 
 
 
 Students in course work should consider options for the semester of the 
anticipated birth such as working with their course instructors to receive 
incomplete grades, electing to drop to part-time status or taking a full semester 
leave of absence. 
 Students engaged in research must work with their faculty to develop plans for 
the research for the time they are away and for resuming upon return. 
 Master's students who receive an academic stipend funded by Carnegie Mellon 
are eligible to continue to receive stipend funding for up to six (6) weeks during a 
Short-Term Maternity Accommodation or a Formal Leave of Absence. Continued 
academic stipend funding may be extended by two (2) weeks, for a total of eight 
(8) weeks, if an absence longer than six weeks is medically necessary. To receive 
this support students must be registered with the Office of the Dean of Students. 
 
4.3.6 Change of Address  
MCDS students are responsible for notifying MCDS and the HUB of all address changes 
in a timely manner. Students will be held responsible for any failure to receive official 
college notices due to not having a correct address on file; F-1 students may jeopardize 
their status if address information is not kept current. 
Students can change their address using SIO, which is available via the HUB website: 
http://www.cmu.edu/hub/index.html  
 
5 Financial Issues 
5.1 Tuition 
5.1.1 Tuition payments 
To understand your invoice, payment options, etc., visit: http://www.cmu.edu/hub . The 
MCDS program sets tuition each year for all students in the program. The student must 
handle tuition problems by contacting The Hub. The MCDS Program Administrators 
cannot solve tuition problems. 
5.1.2 Sponsored Students 
A sponsored student is one who has another party (such as an embassy or company) who 
has agreed to pay the student’s tuition. Please read the “Sponsored Students” section. 
5.1.3 Employer Reimbursement Process 
If you have an employer reimbursement plan, write your employer’s name and address 
on the bill (or provide CMU with a letter of support) and pay at least one-third of the  
 33tuition charge when returning the bill. You must pay previous semester balances before 
you can enroll for the next semester. 
5.1.4 Carnegie Mellon employee reimbursement procedure 
Contact the Benefits Office for specific information on tuition benefits. You must 
complete a Tuition Remission Form each semester in order to receive these benefits. To 
receive a Tuition Remission Form, visit the Human Resources website at: 
http://www.cmu.edu/hr . 
5.1.5 Financial aid, tuition waivers, Scholarships 
The MCDS degree program does not provide financial aid to graduate students, nor does 
it provide tuition waivers or scholarships. For complete financial aid information see: 
https://www.cmu.edu/sfs/financial-aid/index.html  . The Financial Aid Office of Carnegie 
Mellon will provide assistance in completing the necessary paperwork to apply for 
Stafford loans.  
 
Graduate students should consult the graduate student financial aid information found 
on The HUB website:  
 
https://www.cmu.edu/sfs/financial-aid/graduate/index.html  . 
Students will find the Graduate Financial Aid Guide, information about funding options 
and how to apply for financial aid and other helpful links. 
 
Graduate students who find themselves in need of immediate funds for emergency 
situations should contact the Office of the Dean of Student Affairs (see Appendix A), 
 www.cmu.edu/student-affairs/index.html , to inquire about an Emergency Student Loan. 
 
U.S. citizens and permanent residents may complete the Free Application for Federal 
Student 
Aid (FAFSA) online at https://fafsa.ed.gov   
Students may obtain information regarding their loans through the William D. Ford 
Direct Loan Program, including deferment forms and payment information  
at  http://www.dlssonline.com/index.asp   
 
Information about the federal student aid programs may be found at 
www.studentaid.ed.gov   
5.1.6 External fellowships 
The MCDS program will accept students with external fellowships. 
5.1.7 Grade Reports 
Grade reports are mailed to individual students by the university at the conclusion of each 
semester. See the official calendar for mailing dates. 
5.1.8 Late Graduation  
 34On occasion, a student and/or his/her employer may request that the student attend 
Carnegie Mellon for an additional semester in order to complete a program that will be 
beneficial to both the student and the employer. Under such circumstances late 
graduation can be arranged. Student is to discuss his/ her situation with the Director. 
5.1.9 Employment Eligibility Verification 
 
If you are receiving a stipend, are a TA, or are planning to have a position with CMU then 
Employment Eligibility Verification is required. Form I-9 must be completed within 3 
business days of beginning work for any type of compensation (stipend or employment). 
Additional details are highlighted below. To ensure compliance with federal law, 
Carnegie Mellon University maintains the Employment Eligibility Verification (I-9) Policy 
covering the university’s I-9 and E-Verify requirements: 
 Every individual receiving a stipend from CMU or employed by CMU must comply 
with the I-9 Policy by completing the Form I-9 within three business days following 
the first day of stipend start date/employment. 
 Individuals who expect to work on a federally funded project are further 
responsible for submitting an E-Verify Processing Request Form to the Office of 
Human Resources if required. 
 For more information, please see CMU’s Guidance for Completing the Form I-9 
and E-Verify Requirements at CM or visit the Human Resources Service website to 
learn more about Form I-9 and E-Verify and to schedule an appointment to 
complete the Form I-9. 
5.2 Conference Travel Funding 
Students funded by a research project may receive travel funding according to policies set by the 
individual projects. Students who have no project funding may be provided with partial funding, 
with a larger amount available for travel to present a refereed conference paper. There is an LTI 
form that must be filled out in advance. 
 
An additional conference travel funding opportunity is provided by GSA and the Provost’s Office 
for students, student work groups or groups to attend a conference, whether as a participant or as 
a presenter. The process is managed by the Graduate Education Office.  Students can find more 
information about the application process and deadlines at: 
 
https://www.cmu.edu/graduate/professional-development/index.html   
 
5.3 Expenses 
The program will reimburse any expenses incurred on behalf of the MCDS 
program if approved by the Director. The student must apply for approval 
of expenses before they are incurred. Verification of purchase and/or 
expenses along with receipts is to be presented to the program 
administrator for reimbursement. Reimbursement requests must be filed  
 35within three months of the calendar date when it was incurred. If the 
reimbursement request concerns pre-approved conference or workshop 
travel expenses of an MCDS students, then it must be filed within three 
months of the calendar date of the event’s last day. Reimbursement 
requests received after this period will not be processed.  The University 
does not reimburse for taxes. 
5.4 Health Insurance 
https://www.cmu.edu/health-services/student-insurance/plans.html   
Carnegie Mellon has a Student Health Insurance policy requiring full-time, degree-
seeking students to carry adequate medical insurance. Students must either purchase 
the plan offered by the University or an application for a waiver can be made if the 
student is “enrolled as the dependent, partner/spouse or principal in an employer or 
government-sponsored insurance plan”.  It is the responsibility of each student to make 
arrangements with Student Health Services to either pay for their insurance at the 
beginning of the semester or elect a payment plan over the course of the academic year. 
More information is available at the Student Health Services Web site 
 https://www.cmu.edu/health-services/student-insurance/plans.html . 
 
 
5.5 Emergency Loans 
Graduate students who find themselves in need of immediate funds for emergency 
situations should contact the Office of the Dean of Students (see Appendix A), 
www.cmu.edu/student-affairs/index.html , to inquire about the types of emergency 
funding available to enrolled students. 
6 Additional University Resources 
6.1 The HUB Student Services Center 
The HUB is located in Warner Hall, Lower Level. The HUB staff delivers comprehensive 
service and counsel to students and families regarding financial aid, billing and 
payment, registration and academic records. The Assistant Directors in The HUB serve 
as contacts for specific colleges and assist enrolled students with key aspects of the 
enrollment process. Student can find their assigned HUB Assistant Director on their 
Student Information Online (SIO) Resource page. Questions that need specialized, in-
depth attention can be directed to the student's assigned Assistant Director. For general 
questions and information, students may email The HUB or call 412-268-8186. 
 
thehub@andrew.cmu.edu and http://www.cmu.edu/hub/  
  
 366.2 Student Information Online (SIO) 
Student Information Online (SIO) is a secure site where students can find important, 
personalized information, including E-Bills and student account information, financial 
aid status and eligibility, grades and QPA, and course schedules. Students can update 
their and their spouse's or domestic partner's contact information, sign up for E-Check & 
E-Refund, authorize their spouses, domestic partners or other individual to receive a 
copy of their E-Bill, request verifications, view their housing and meal plan assignments, 
and much more. Students can log on to SIO by going to www.cmu.edu/hub/sio and 
entering their Andrew User ID and password. 
 
On SIO, students will designate an emergency contact address of a relative or family 
friend to be contacted in the case of an emergency. If students do not want their name 
and address published in the campus directory, they must notify the HUB in writing. 
 
6.3 ID Cards 
Graduate students can obtain their ID card from The HUB once they have been entered 
into SIO for the semester. These cards identify their holders as members of the campus 
community. Student cards are deactivated upon the cardholder’s separation from the 
university. 
 
Affiliate ID Cards are available for spouses and partners of graduate students that allow 
them to access Carnegie Mellon’s campus. These cards are available through The HUB to 
spouses and partners of graduate students who are enrolled for the current academic 
year in a full-time graduate degree program. The card is valid for one year. For 
information about domestic partner registration, visit the Office of the Dean of Student 
Affairs webpage: 
  
http://www.studentaffairs.cmu.edu/dean/domestic_partner/ . 
 
For more information about student and affiliate ID cards (spouse, domestic partners and 
dependent children), please visit: http://www.cmu.edu/idplus/idcards/cardtypes.html . 
 
6.4 Transcripts 
Information about and instructions for ordering transcripts are available at:  
www.cmu.edu/hub/transcripts.html .  
Transcript questions may be directed to esg- transcripts@andrew.cmu.edu . 
 
6.5 Pittsburgh Council on Higher Education (PCHE) and Cross-registration 
Carnegie Mellon University offers students the opportunity to take courses for credit 
through a cross-registration program (see Pittsburgh Council on Higher Education 
(PCHE) and Cross-registration below) and through the receipt of transfer credit from  
 37other accredited institutions. The Carnegie Mellon University transcript will include 
information on such courses as follows: Carnegie Mellon courses and courses taken 
through the university's cross-registration program will have grades recorded on the 
transcript and be factored into the QPA. All other courses will be recorded on this 
transcript indicating where the course was taken, but without grades. Such courses will 
not be taken into account for academic actions, honors or QPA calculations. NOTE: 
Suspended students may take courses elsewhere; however, they may receive transfer 
credit only if their college's and department's policies allow this. You can review the 
PCHE cross-registration guidelines here: 
https://www.cmu.edu/policies/student-and-student-life/cross-college-university-
registration.html   
 
6.6 Student Privacy Rights and FERPA 
This university policy notifies students of their rights under the federal Family 
Educational Rights and Privacy Act (FERPA). According to FERPA, students have the 
right to: 
 Inspect and review their education records; 
 Request an amendment to their education record if they believe they are 
inaccurate or misleading; 
 Request a hearing if their request for an amendment is not resolved to their 
satisfaction; 
 Consent to disclosure of personally identifiable information from their education 
records, except to the extent that FERPA authorizes disclosure without consent; 
 File a complaint with the U.S. Department of Education Family Policy 
Compliance Office if they believe their rights under FERPA have been violated. 
For questions about Student Privacy Rights, FERPA or filing a complaint, contact John 
Papinchak, University Registrar, jp7p@andrew.cmu.edu , in Enrollment Services. 
 
You can review the university’s policy on privacy rights here: 
https://www.cmu.edu/policies/student-and-student-life/privacy-rights-
students.html  
6.7 Academic Calendar 
The Academic Calendar can be found at 
https://www.cmu.edu/hub/calendar/index.html  and provides information 
on all deadlines including registration dates, class start dates, add/drop 
deadlines, exam dates and more. 
6.8 Professional Development 
The Career and Professional Development Center (CPDC) at Carnegie 
Mellon is a centralized career center staffed by a team of seasoned and 
highly educated professionals who orchestrate the career exploration,  
 38experiential learning, and career networking needs of students and 
alumni. 
 
CMU's career and professional development model is grounded in 
discipline-specific career development, experiential learning, and 
employer relations shaped by strong connections with the university's 
seven academic colleges. The center's success is founded upon a solid 
understanding of career and professional development theory, integration 
of technology, and an unwavering commitment to providing personalized 
attention towards meeting the unique individual needs of students, 
alumni, and employers. The CDPC is located on the Lower Level of the 
University Center, 412-268-2064 
 
The Office of the Assistant Vice Provost for Graduate Education (AVPGE) 
offers a robust schedule of professional development opportunities. Some 
are geared towards a specific population (master’s students, PhD students 
at the beginning of their program, graduate students seeking tenure track 
positions, etc.) and others are open to all graduate students (time 
management, balancing, staying healthy). A full schedule of programs can 
be found at: http://www.cmu.edu/graduate/.  
 
http://www.studentaffairs.cmu.edu/career/index.html  
6.9 University Libraries 
There are three main libraries at Carnegie Mellon: Hunt Library, Mellon 
Institute Library and Engineering & Science Library with the combined 
mission of providing access and help to graduate students in finding the 
information needed, teaching graduate students to evaluate available 
information and use reliable sources. The libraries’ digital resources and 
services, including off-campus/ wireless access to databases and e-
journals, offer online access. There are also two neighboring libraries 
open to Carnegie Mellon graduate students: Carnegie Library of Pittsburgh 
and University of Pittsburgh Libraries. Visit the University Libraries 
website for information about all mentioned library locations and hours, 
on-line resources and FAQ’s. 
  
 39More information can be found at: 
http://www.library.cmu.edu/   
6.10 Computing Services 
Computing Services is located in Cyert Hall 285. Computing Services 
develops, maintains and supports the computing infrastructure for 
Carnegie Mellon students, faculty members and staff members. This 
includes the campus wired and wireless networks, public computer labs 
or “clusters,” cable television and telephone services, computing related 
documentation and support through the Help Center. In addition, 
Computing Services provides standard classroom technologies for over 
100 lecture halls, classrooms and seminar rooms across campus. The 
website contains additional information regarding The Help Center hours, 
location and contact information, computing cluster hours and location, 
the Carnegie Mellon web portal, computing security and policies and 
guidelines. Students can email the Help Center at 
advisor@andrew.cmu.edu with questions and for assistance. 
 
More information  
http://www.cmu.edu/computing/  
6.11 Family and Dependents Resources 
The Graduate Student Assembly website maintains a resource page for 
spouses, domestic partners and families of graduate students, including 
The Student Parent Association, new mother rooms, and links to resources 
around campus and the Pittsburgh area. 
 
Affiliate ID Cards are available for spouses and domestic partners of 
graduate students that allow them to access Carnegie Mellon’s campus. 
These cards are available through The HUB to spouses and partners of 
graduate students who are enrolled for the current academic year in a full-
time graduate degree program. The card is valid for one year.  
 
More information can be found at: 
http://www.cmu.edu/stugov/gsa/resources/family.html 
  
 40For more information about student and affiliate ID cards, please visit: 
http://www.cmu.edu/idplus/idcards/cardtypes.html.  
6.12 Domestic Partner Registration 
Carnegie Mellon extends certain benefits to domestic partners of students. 
Eligible students may elect benefits for their domestic partners through 
the registration process orchestrated by the Office of the Dean of Student 
Affairs, located on the 3rd floor of Warner Hall. See the web site for 
information regarding the benefits available for domestic partners, 
eligibility for domestic partner benefits, registration instructions and 
forms. 
 
More information can be found at: 
http://www.studentaffairs.cmu.edu/dean/domestic_partner/index.html  
6.13 Housing 
The University does not currently offer housing to graduate students. The 
Office of Housing and Dining Services does provide community housing 
information on a very limited basis to assist graduate students who are 
seeking housing in the communities surrounding the university, including 
information on the legal aspects of renting an apartment, moving 
checklists and the off-campus housing database.  
More information can be found at: 
www.cmu.edu/housing/community-housing/index.html  
 
6.14 Dining 
Dining services and operations are offered through the Office of Housing 
and Dining Services. The office operates dining locations open around 
campus in academic buildings, Hunt Library and the University Center. 
These locations offer flexible hours with options from the early morning 
through late night. The Dining Service website contains information about 
dining locations, hours of operation, graduate student dining plans forms, 
nutritional information, and weekly menus for dining locations. 
 
More information can be found at:  
 41http://www.cmu.edu/dining/  
6.15 Parking and Transportation 
Graduate students will find information about parking and availability, 
parking policies, transportation options and Port Authority Transit usage 
with a valid university ID on the Parking and Transportation Services site. 
The Parking and Transportation Services office is located in the lower 
level of the University Center, LL#8. There is limited parking on campus 
and the varying permit rates can be found on the website. All parking 
areas of campus are either by permit, metered or by the hour in the 
garage. Parking and Transportation Services will ticket any car parked in a 
permit area without a permit or at an expired meter. The city monitors the 
metered parking along Margaret Morrison, Frew and Tech Streets and will 
ticket at expired meters as well. 
 
More information can be found at: 
http://www.cmu.edu/parking/  
 
The University offers shuttle and escort services operated through 
University Police. The Shuttle Service operates several routes within 
Oakland, Squirrel Hill and Shadyside areas, as well as to university sites 
located outside of the main campus. The Escort Service offers vehicle 
routes within a radius of campus between 6:30 pm-6 am daily. Information 
regarding up-to-date shuttle and escort schedules, pick-up/drop-off 
locations, routes and usage policies can be found at: 
www.cmu.edu/police/shuttleandescort/.  
 
SafeWalk provides another option to campus community members 
walking across and around campus during late-night hours. SafeWalk is a 
student volunteer organization that provides campus escorts for all 
members of the Carnegie Mellon community. SafeWalk operates nightly 
during the regular academic year (except certain holidays and break 
periods) from 10pm until 2am. Students, faculty and staff may request an 
escort by calling 412-268-SAFE (8-7233 from a campus phone), by 
approaching an escort team, or by stopping by the SafeWalk dispatch area 
in the University Center, Lower Level near the Post Office Package Pick- 
 42Up window between 10pm-2am. SafeWalk will escort to locations 
approximately one mile from campus. Additional SafeWalk information 
can be found at: 
www.studentaffairs.cmu.edu/safewalk.  
6.16 Copying, Printing and Mailing Services 
Carnegie Mellon offers community members easy access to FedEx, copy 
centers, printing and mailing services, and postal services. More 
information regarding these services, locations and contact information 
can be found at the provided link. 
More information can be found at: 
http://www.cmu.edu/student-
affairs/theword/campus_resources/copyprintmail.html  
6.17 University Center 
The University Center is a centerpiece of the campus that provides a space 
for special events, physical fitness, student organizations and various 
activities, as well as accommodating retail and dining services. As the 
campus crossroads, the University Center functions as a place for students 
to interact, get involved and enjoy new experiences. Visit the University 
Center website for information about campus eateries, ATMs and PNC 
Bank, fitness rooms and schedules, retail stores, scheduling University 
Center space, the public prayer room, student organizations and the 
Wright-Rogal Chapel. 
 
The University Center Information Desk is the location if you want to 
know about upcoming campus events or have questions about Carnegie 
Mellon in general, call the Information Desk at 412-268-2107. The 
Information Desk not only provides information about campus events, but 
also sells postage stamps, makes copies, sends faxes, distributes campus 
maps, manages a lost & found, and has information brochures about 
Pittsburgh and the campus. 
More information can be found at: 
http://www.cmu.edu/university-center  
6.18 Athletic/Fitness Facilities 
For the participant or the spectator, Carnegie Mellon offers intercollegiate  
 43athletics, intramural sports, physical education classes and club sports. 
The Athletics Department also offers aerobics classes in the University 
Center and Skibo Gym as well as occasional workshops and instruction 
related to fitness and health. The Athletics Office is located in the Skibo 
Gymnasium. 
 
Skibo Gym facilities include courts for basketball, volleyball, badminton, 
as well as weight- training and aerobic equipment. The University Center’s 
recreational facilities include an eight- lane pool, racquetball and squash 
courts, aerobics room, fitness center and gym for basketball and 
volleyball. All users must present a current Carnegie Mellon Card to use 
these facilities. 
More information can be found at: 
http://www.cmu.edu/athletics  
6.19 CMU Alert 
CMU Alert sends voice and/or text messages to registered phones in the 
event of a campus emergency that threatens public safety or during tests 
of the system in the Spring and Fall semesters. Students can register for 
CMU Alert through the web site. More information can be found at: 
http://www.cmu.edu/alert  
6.20 Accidents on CMU property 
Please report all accidents to Charity Anderson 
(caanders@andrew.cmu.edu) and the MCDS program administrator. You 
will be asked to complete an accident report. By reporting accidents, the 
student helps minimize future harm! Serious accidents and accidents 
taking place elsewhere on campus should be reported to Campus Police, 
x8-6232 (non-emergency), x8-2323 (emergency). 
6.21 Consumer Information 
Carnegie Mellon University suggests that all current and prospective 
students be informed consumers. Please see this link for detailed 
consumer information: https://www.cmu.edu/hub/consumer-
information/ . 
  
 44 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Appendix A 
2023-2024 
Highlighted University Resources for Graduate Students  
 i 
Table of Contents 
Key Resources for Graduate Student Support  1  
Office of Graduate and Postdoctoral Affairs  1  
Office of the Dean of Students  1  
The Division of Student Affairs  2  
Center for Student Diversity & Inclusion  2  
Assistance for Individuals with Disabilities  3  
Eberly Center for Teaching Excellence & Educational Innovation  3  
Graduate Student Assembly  4  
Office of International Education (OIE)  4  
Veterans and Military Community  5  
Carnegie Mellon Ethics Hotline  5  
Policy Against Retaliation  5  
Key Offices for Academic & Research Support  6  
Computing and Information Resources  6  
Student Academic Success Center  6  
University Libraries  6  
Research at CMU  7  
Office of Research Integrity & Compliance  7  
Key Offices for Health, Wellness & Safety  7  
Counseling & Psychological Services  7  
Health Services  8  
Campus Wellness  8  
Religious and Spiritual Life Initiatives (RSLI)  8  
University Police  9  
Shuttle and Escort Services  9  
The WORD  10  
  
 1 7 Key Resources for Graduate Student Support  
8 Office of Graduate and Postdoctoral Affairs  
https://www.cmu.edu/graduate  
graded@cmu.edu  
The Office of Graduate and Postdoctoral Affairs provides university-wide 
support for all graduate students and academic programs, with a focus on 
supporting graduate student success at Carnegie Mellon.  Examples of 
resources offered through the Office of Graduate and Postdoctoral Affairs 
include, but are not limited to:  
 Website with university resources, contact information for CMU 
programs and services, possible financial assistance and potential 
funding opportunities, and various procedural and policy information 
 Newsletter to all graduate students with information on activities, 
resources, and opportunities  
 Professional development seminars and workshops, and various 
programming and events for the graduate student community  
The Office of Graduate and Postdoctoral Affairs also works directly with the 
colleges and departments on issues related to graduate students and serve as a 
resource for developing policy and procedures.  The Office of Graduate and 
Postdoctoral Affairs partners with many other offices and organizations, such 
as the Graduate Student Assembly, to support the holistic graduate student 
educational experience.  
9 Office of the Dean of Students  
https://www.cmu.edu/student-affairs/dean/  
The Office of the Dean of Students provides central leadership of the meta 
curricular experience at Carnegie Mellon including the coordination of student 
support.  Graduate students will find the enrollment information for Domestic 
Partner Registration and Parental Accommodations in the Office of the Dean of 
Students or on their website. This Office also manages the Student Emergency 
Support Funding process. There are currently three forms of support funding 
for enrolled students: emergency student loans, student parental loans, and 
the Tartan Emergency Support Fund. Inquiring students will be provided with 
additional information about the various types of funding during a 
consultation meeting with a member of the Dean of Students team. Tuition  
 2 costs are not eligible for Student Emergency Support funding.  
College Liaisons and the Student Support Resources team serve as additional 
resources for graduate students. College Liaisons are senior members of the 
Division of Student Affairs who work with departments and colleges 
addressing student concerns across a wide range of issues. College Liaisons are 
identified on the Important Contacts list in Student Information Online (SIO). 
The Student Support Resources team offers an additional level of support for 
students who are navigating a wide range of life events. Student Support 
Resources staff members work in partnership with campus and community 
resources to provide coordination of care and support appropriate to each 
student’s situation.  
10 The Division of Student Affairs  
The Division of Student Affairs includes (not an exhaustive list):  
 Athletics, Physical Education and Recreation 
 Career and Professional Development Center (CPDC)  
 Center for Student Diversity and Inclusion  
 Cohon University Center  
 Counseling & Psychological Services (CaPS)  
 Dining Services  
 Office of Community Standards and Integrity (OCSI)  
 Office of Student Leadership, Involvement, and Civic Engagement 
(SLICE)  
 University Health Services (UHS)  
 Wellness Initiatives  
11 Center for Student Diversity & Inclusion  
https://www.cmu.edu/student-diversity/  
Diversity and inclusion have a singular place among the values of Carnegie 
Mellon University. The Center for Student Diversity & Inclusion actively 
cultivates a strong, diverse and inclusive community capable of living out these 
values and advancing research, creativity, learning and development that 
changes the world.  
The Center offers resources to enhance an inclusive and transformative  
 3 student experience in dimensions such as access, success, campus climate and 
intergroup dialogue. Additionally, the Center supports and connects 
historically underrepresented students and those who are first in their family 
to attend college in a setting where students’ differences and talents are 
appreciated and reinforced, both at the graduate and undergraduate level. 
Initiatives coordinated by the Center include, but are not limited to:  
 First generation/first in family to attend college programs 
 LGBTQ+ Initiatives  
 Race and ethnically focused programs, including Inter-University 
Graduate Students of Color Series (SOC) and PhD SOC Network  
 Women’s empowerment programs, including Graduate Women’s 
Gatherings (GWGs)  
12 Assistance for Individuals with Disabilities  
https://www.cmu.edu/disability-resources/  
The Office of Disability Resources at Carnegie Mellon University has a 
continued mission to provide physical, digital, and programmatic access to 
ensure that students with disabilities have equal access to their educational 
experience.  The Office works to ensure that qualified individuals receive 
reasonable accommodations as guaranteed by the Americans with Disabilities 
Act (ADA) and Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973. Students who 
would like to receive accommodations can begin the process through Disability 
Resources' secure online portal or email access@andrew.cmu.edu to begin the 
interactive accommodation Process. 
Students with physical, sensory, cognitive, or emotional disabilities are 
encouraged to self-identify with the Office of Disability Resources and request 
needed accommodations. Any questions about the process can be directed to 
access@andrew.cmu.edu, or call (412) 268- 6121.  
13 Eberly Center for Teaching Excellence & Educational Innovation  
https://www.cmu.edu/teaching/  
The Eberly Center offers a wide variety of confidential, consultation services 
and professional development programs to support graduate students as 
teaching assistants or instructors of record during their time at Carnegie 
Mellon University and as future faculty members at other institutions. 
Regardless of one's current or future teaching context and duties, Eberly’s goal 
is to disseminate evidence-based teaching strategies in ways that are accessible  
 4 and actionable. Programs and services include campus-wide Graduate Student 
Instructor Orientation events and our Future Faculty Program, both of which 
are designed to help participants be effective and efficient in their teaching 
roles. The Eberly Center also assists departments in creating and conducting 
customized programs to meet the specific needs of their graduate student 
instructors. Specific information about Eberly Center support for graduate 
students is found at:  
https://www.cmu.edu/teaching/graduatestudentsupport/  
14 Graduate Student Assembly  
https://www.cmu.edu/stugov/gsa/  
The Graduate Student Assembly (GSA) is the branch of Carnegie Mellon 
Student Government that represents and advocates for the diverse interests of 
all graduate students at CMU. GSA is composed of representatives from the 
different graduate programs and departments who want to improve the 
graduate student experience at the different levels of the university. GSA is 
funded by the Student Activities Fee from all graduate students. GSA passes 
legislation, allocates student activities funding, advocates for legislative action 
locally and in Washington D.C. on behalf of graduate student issues and needs, 
and otherwise acts on behalf of all graduate student interests. GSA’s recent 
accomplishments are a testament to their making a difference, and steps to 
implementing the vision laid out by the strategic plan.  
https://www.cmu.edu/stugov/gsa/about-the-gsa/strategic-plan.html  
GSA offers an expanding suite of social programming on and off-campus to 
bring graduate students from different departments together and build a sense 
of community. GSA is the host of the Graduate Student Lounge on the 3rd floor 
of the Cohon University Center. GSA also maintains a website of graduate 
student resources on and off-campus. GSA continues to rely on student 
feedback to improve the graduate student experience at CMU. Feel free to 
contact them at gsa@cmu.edu  to get involved, stop by their office in the Cohon 
University Center Room 304 or become a representative for your department. 
15 Office of International Education (OIE)  
https://www.cmu.edu/oie/  
Carnegie Mellon hosts international graduate and undergraduate students who 
come from more than 90 countries. The Office of International Education (OIE) 
is the liaison to the University for all non-immigrant students and scholars, as 
well the repository for study abroad opportunities. OIE provides many services  
 5 including: advising on personal, immigration, study abroad, academic, and 
social and acculturation issues; presenting programs of interest such as 
international career workshops, tax workshops, and cross-cultural and 
immigration workshops; international education and statistics on international 
students in the United States; posting pertinent information to students 
through email and the OIE website and conducting orientation and pre-
departure programs.  
16 Veterans and Military Community  
https://www.cmu.edu/veterans/  
Military veterans are a vital part of the Carnegie Mellon University community. 
Graduate students can find information on applying for veteran education 
benefits, campus services, veteran’s groups at CMU, and non-educational 
resources through the Veterans and Military Community website. There are 
also links and connections to veteran resource in the Pittsburgh community. 
The ROTC and Veteran Affairs Coordinator can be reached at  
urovaedbenefits@andrew.cmu.edu  or 412-268-8747.  
17 Carnegie Mellon Ethics Hotline  
https://www.cmu.edu/hr/resources/ethics-hotline.html 
The health, safety and well-being of the university community are top 
priorities at Carnegie Mellon University. CMU provides a hotline that all 
members of the university community should use to confidentially report 
suspected unethical activity, violations of university policy, or violations of 
law. Students, faculty and staff can anonymously file a report by calling 1-844-
587-0793 or visiting https://cmu.ethicspoint.com/ . All submissions are reported to 
appropriate university personnel and handled discreetly. 
The hotline is NOT an emergency service. For emergencies, call University 
Police at 412-268-2323. 
18 Policy Against Retaliation  
It is the policy of Carnegie Mellon University to protect from retaliation any 
individual who makes a good faith report of a suspected violation of any 
applicable law or regulation, university Policy or procedure, any contractual 
obligation of the university, and any report made pursuant to the Carnegie 
Mellon University Code of Business Ethics and Conduct.  
Additional details regarding the Policy Against Retaliation are available at: 
 https://www.cmu.edu/policies/administrative-and-governance/whistleblower.html   
 6 19 Key Offices for Academic & Research Support  
20 Computing and Information Resources  
https://www.cmu.edu/computing/  
Computing Services maintains and supports computing resources for the 
campus community, including the campus wired and wireless networks, 
printing, computer labs, file storage, email and software catalog. As members 
of this community, we are all responsible for the security of these shared 
resources. Be sure to review the Safe Computing 
(https://www.cmu.edu/computing/safe/ ) section and the University Computing Policy 
(https://www.cmu.edu/policies/information-technology/computing.html )  
Visit the Computing Services website  (https://www.cmu.edu/computing/ ) to learn more. For 
assistance the Computing Services Help Center is available at 412-268-4357 (HELP) or  
ithelp@cmu.edu .  
21 Student Academic Success Center  
https://www.cmu.edu/student-success/ 
The Student Academic Success Center’s (SASC) work to support success focuses on creating 
spaces for students to engage in their coursework and approach to learning through many 
group and individual program options.  SASC supports student success by providing 
academic coaching, subject-specific tutoring, effective communication strategies, 
accommodations for students with disabilities, and language support for multilingual 
learners. SASC engages with faculty and staff to improve the coordination and professional 
development for academic advisors. Visit the SASC website for more information about 
services offered in areas such as communication and language support; language and cross-
cultural support; and learning support.   
22 University Libraries  
https://www.library.cmu.edu/  
The University Libraries offers a wide range of information, resources, and 
services supporting graduate students in coursework, research, teaching, and 
publishing. The library licenses and purchases books, journals, media, and 
other needed materials in various formats. Library liaisons, consultants, and 
information specialists provide in-depth and professional assistance and 
advice in all-things information, including: 
 Locating and obtaining specific resources  
 7  Providing specialized research support 
 Advanced training in the use and management of data 
Sign up for workshops and hands-on topic-specific sessions such as data 
visualization with Tableau, cleaning data with OpenRefine, and getting started 
with Zotero. Weekly drop-in hours for Digital Humanities and for Research 
Data Research Management are scheduled during the academic year. Start at 
the library home page to find the books, journals, and databases you need; to 
identify and reach out to the library liaison in your field; to sign up for 
scheduled workshops; and to connect with consultants in scholarly publishing, 
research data management, and digital humanities.  
23 Research at CMU  
https://www.cmu.edu/research/  
The primary purpose of research at the university is the advancement of 
knowledge in all fields in which the university is active. Research is regarded 
as one of the university’s major contributions to society and as an essential 
element in education, particularly at the graduate level and in faculty 
development. Research activities are governed by several university policies. 
Guidance and more general information are found by visiting the Research at 
Carnegie Mellon website.  
24 Office of Research Integrity & Compliance  
https://www.cmu.edu/research-compliance/  
The Office of Research Integrity & Compliance (ORIC) is designed to support 
research at Carnegie Mellon University. The staff work with researchers to 
ensure research is conducted with integrity and in accordance with federal and 
Pennsylvania regulation. ORIC assists researchers with human subject 
research, conflicts of interest, responsible conduct of research, export 
controls, and institutional animal care & use. ORIC also provides consultation,  
advice, and review of allegations of research misconduct.  
25 Key Offices for Health, Wellness & Safety  
26 Counseling & Psychological Services  
https://www.cmu.edu/counseling/  
Counseling & Psychological Services (CaPS) affords the opportunity for 
students to talk privately about academic and personal concerns in a safe, 
confidential setting. An initial consultation at CaPS can help clarify the nature  
 8 of the concern, provide immediate support, and explore further options if 
needed. These may include a referral for counseling within CaPS, to another 
resource at Carnegie Mellon, or to another resource within the larger 
Pittsburgh community. CaPS also provides workshops and group sessions on 
mental health related topics specifically for graduate students on campus. 
CaPS services are provided at no cost. Appointments can be made in person, or 
by telephone at 412-268-2922.  
27 Health Services  
https://www.cmu.edu/HealthServices/  
University Health Services (UHS) is staffed by physicians, advanced practice 
clinicians and registered nurses who provide general medical care, allergy 
injections, first aid, gynecological care, and contraception as well as on-site 
pharmaceuticals. The CMU Student Insurance Plan covers most visit fees to see 
the physicians and advanced practice clinicians & nurse visits. Fees for 
prescription medications, laboratory tests, diagnostic procedures and referral 
to the emergency room or specialists are the student’s responsibility and 
students should review the UHS website and their insurance plan for detailed 
information about the university health insurance requirement and fees.  
UHS also has a registered dietician and health promotion specialists on staff to 
assist students in addressing nutrition, drug and alcohol and other healthy 
lifestyle issues. In addition to providing direct health care, UHS administers 
the Student Health Insurance Program. The Student Health Insurance plan 
offers a high level of coverage in a wide network of health care providers and 
hospitals. Appointments can be made by visiting UHS’s website, walk-in, or by 
telephone, 412-268-2157.  
28 Campus Wellness  
https://www.cmu.edu/wellness/  
At Carnegie Mellon, we believe our individual and collective well-being is 
rooted in healthy connections to each other and to campus resources. The 
university provides a wide variety of wellness, mindfulness and connectedness 
initiatives and resources designed to help students thrive inside and outside 
the classroom.  
29 Religious and Spiritual Life Initiatives (RSLI)  
https://www.cmu.edu/wellbeing/resources/religious-spiritual/index.html 
Carnegie Mellon is committed to the holistic growth of our students, including  
 9 creating opportunities for spiritual and religious practice and exploration. 
RSLI has relationships with local houses of worship from various traditions 
and many of these groups are members of CMU’s Council of Religious 
Advisors. They also offer programs and initiatives that cross traditional 
religious boundaries in order to increase knowledge of and appreciation for 
the full diversity of the worldview traditions. RSLI staff are available to support 
students across the spectrum of religious and spiritual practice and would be 
more than happy to help you make a connection into a community of faith 
during your time at CMU.  
30 University Police  
https://www.cmu.edu/police/  
x2323  
The University Police Department is located at 4551 Filmore Street     . The 
department’s services include police patrols and call response, criminal 
investigations, fixed officer and foot officer patrols, event security, and crime 
prevention and education programming as well as bicycle and laptop 
registration. Visit the department’s website for additional information about 
the staff, emergency phone locations, crime prevention, lost and found, 
fingerprint services, and annual statistic reports. Carnegie Mellon University 
publishes an annual campus security and fire safety report describing the 
university’s security, alcohol and drug, sexual assault, and fire safety policies.  
The report also contains statistics about the number and type of crimes 
committed on the campus and the number and cause of fires in campus 
residence facilities during the preceding three years. Graduate students can 
obtain a copy by contacting the University Police Department at x2323. The 
annual security and fire safety report is also available online at:  
https://www.cmu.edu/police/annualreports/  
31 Shuttle and Escort Services  
https://www.cmu.edu/parking/transport/ 
Parking and Transportation coordinates the Shuttle Service and Escort Service 
provided for CMU students, faculty, and community. The Shuttle & Escort 
website has full information about these services, stops, routes, tracking and 
schedules.  
   
 1032 The WORD  
https://www.cmu.edu/student-affairs/theword/ 
The WORD is Carnegie Mellon University’s online student handbook and 
serves as the foundation for the department (and sometimes college) 
handbook. The WORD contains university-wide academic policy information 
and resources, community policies and resources, and describes the university 
level procedures used to review possible violations of these standards. It is 
designed to provide all students with the tools, guidance, and insights to help 
you achieve your full potential as a member of the Carnegie Mellon 
community. Graduate students are encouraged to bookmark this site and refer 
to it often. University policies can also be found in full text at: 
https://www.cmu.edu/policies/ . 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 1 
  
 
 
 
 
 
 
Ph.D. in Language and Information Technologies 
 
Student Handbook  
2023 -2024  
 
 
 
 
Last revision: Tuesday, August 29, 2023  
 
LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 2 
   LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 3 
 Contents  
1 Introduction  ........................................................................................................................................ 9 
1.1 Degrees Offered  .................................................................................................................................. 9 
1.2 Department Personnel  ..................................................................................................................... 10 
1.3 University Policies and Expectations .......................................................................................... 10 
1.4 The Academic Calendar  .................................................................................................................. 11 
1.5 Carnegie Mellon University Statement of Assurance  ............................................................. 11 
1.6 The Carnegie Mellon Code  ............................................................................................................. 12 
2 The Language Technologies Institute  ......................................................................................... 12 
2.1 Pittsburgh Campus Location  ......................................................................................................... 12 
2.2 Office Space  ........................................................................................................................................ 13 
2.3 Mailboxes and Office Supplies ...................................................................................................... 13 
2.4 Photocopies and Printers ................................................................................................................ 13 
2.5 Computers for LTI Ph.D. Students  ............................................................................................... 13 
3 Standard Degree Requirements & Degree Certification  ....................................................... 14 
3.1 LTI Ph.D. Degree Requirements  ................................................................................................... 14 
3.1.1  Course Requirements  ............................................................................................................. 14 
3.1.2  Grade Requirements  ............................................................................................................... 15 
3.1.3  Proficiency Requirements ...................................................................................................... 15 
3.1.4  The Ph.D. Dissertation  ............................................................................................................ 16 
3.1.5  Research Speaking Requirement  ......................................................................................... 17 
3.2 Advising  .............................................................................................................................................. 17 LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 4 
 3.3 LTI Orientation  .................................................................................................................................  18 
3.4 End of Semester Evaluation ............................................................................................................ 18 
3.5 Electives Outside of SCS  ................................................................................................................. 19 
3.6 Completing an M.S. Degree Enrou te to a Ph.D. ........................................................................ 19 
3.7 Grading and Evaluation  ................................................................................................................. 20 
3.7.1  University Policy on Grades  .................................................................................................  20 
3.7.2  University Policy on Grades for Transfer Courses  ......................................................... 20 
3.8 Academic Integrity  ........................................................................................................................... 21 
3.9 Withdrawal of a Degree  ................................................................................................................. 22 
3.10 Employment Eligibility Verification  ........................................................................................... 22 
3.11 Additional Guidance for Students  ............................................................................................... 22 
3.11.1  Program of Study  ..................................................................................................................... 23 
3.11.2  Financial Aid and Student Account  ................................................................................... 23 
3.11.3  International Students  ........................................................................................................... 23 
4 Ph.D. Academic Policies  ................................................................................................................. 23 
4.1 Duration of Study  ............................................................................................................................ 23 
4.1.1  Department Policy on Double Counting Courses  .......................................................... 24 
4.1.2  External Internships  .............................................................................................................. 24 
4.1.3  Maximum Courseload  ........................................................................................................... 25 
4.1.4  Pass/Fail Grades ...................................................................................................................... 25 
4.1.5  Transfer Credit  ........................................................................................................................ 25 
4.1.6  Residency Requirements  ...................................................................................................... 25 
4.1.7  Transferring Into the Ph.D. Program  .................................................................................. 26 LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 5 
 4.1.8  Transferring Out of the Ph.D. Program  ............................................................................. 26 
4.2 LTI Academic Policies  .................................................................................................................... 26 
4.2.1  “Grandfather” Policy  .............................................................................................................. 26 
4.2.2  Definition of Transfer Credit vs. Course Exemption  ...................................................... 26 
4.2.3  External Employment/Consulting ...................................................................................... 26 
4.2.4  Leave of Absence  ..................................................................................................................... 27 
4.2.5  Satisfactory Progress .............................................................................................................. 27 
4.2.6  Time Away from Academic Responsibilities  ................................................................... 27 
4.3 CMU Academic Policies  ................................................................................................................ 27 
4.3.1  Drop/Add/Withdraw Procedures  ....................................................................................... 27 
4.3.2  Doctoral Student Status  ........................................................................................................ 28 
4.3.3  ABD versus ABD in Absentia (ABS)  ................................................................................... 28 
4.3.4  Statute of Limitations: Time to Degree .............................................................................. 28 
4.3.5  University Financial Aid  ....................................................................................................... 29 
4.3.6  Assistance for Individuals with Disabilities ..................................................................... 29 
4.3.7  Summary of Graduate Student Appeal and Grievance Procedures  ............................ 29 
4.3.8  Sexual Misconduct Policy ..................................................................................................... 29 
4.3.9  Gestational and Parental Accommodations ..................................................................... 30 
4.3.10  Accommodations for Gestational Parents  ........................................................................ 30 
4.3.11  Parental Accommodation for Doctoral Students  ............................................................. 31 
4.3.12  Financial Assistance for Student Parents  .......................................................................... 31 
4.3.13  Consensual Intimate Relationship Policy Regarding Undergraduate Students  .... 32 
5 Financial Support  ............................................................................................................................. 32 LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 6 
 5.1 Graduate Student Funding  ........................................................................................................... 32 
5.2 Conference Travel Funding  ........................................................................................................... 32 
5.3 Research Funding  ............................................................................................................................ 33 
5.4 Office of the Dean of Students Emergency Support Funding  ............................................... 33 
5.5 Health Insurance  .............................................................................................................................. 33 
6 Additional University Resources  ................................................................................................. 33 
6.1 The HUB Student Services Center  .............................................................................................. 33 
6.2 Student Information Onlin e (SIO)  .............................................................................................. 34 
6.3 ID Cards  ............................................................................................................................................. 34 
6.4 Transcripts ........................................................................................................................................ 35 
6.5 Pittsburgh Council on Higher Education (PCHE) and Cross -registration  ...................... 35 
6.6 Student Privacy Rights and FERPA  ............................................................................................ 35 
6.7 Professional Development  ............................................................................................................. 36 
6.8 University Libraries ........................................................................................................................ 36 
6.9 Computing Services  ........................................................................................................................ 37 
6.10  Family and Dependents Resources ............................................................................................. 37 
6.11 Domestic Partner Registration  ..................................................................................................... 37 
6.12 Housing  .............................................................................................................................................. 37 
6.13 Dining  ................................................................................................................................................. 38 
6.14  Parking and Transportation  .......................................................................................................... 38 
6.15 Copying, Printing, and Mailing Services ................................................................................... 38 
6.16 University Center  ............................................................................................................................ 38 
6.17 Athletic/Fitness Facilities .............................................................................................................. 39 LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 7 
 6.18 CMU Alert  ......................................................................................................................................... 39 
Appendix A ................................................................................................................................................ 40 
A.1 Key Resources for Graduate Student Support  .......................................................................... 41 
A.1.1  Office of Graduate and Postdoctoral Affairs  ..................................................................... 41 
A.1.2  Office of the Dean of Students  .............................................................................................. 41 
A.1.3  The Division of Student Affairs ........................................................................................... 42 
A.1.4  Center for Student Diversity & Inclusion  ........................................................................ 42 
A.1.5  Assistance for Individuals with Disabilities ..................................................................... 43 
A.1.6  Eberly Center for Teaching Excellence & Educational I nnovation  ........................... 43 
A.1.7  Graduate Student Assembly  ................................................................................................ 44 
A.1.8  Office of International Education (OIE)  ........................................................................... 44 
A.1.9  Veterans and Military Community  .................................................................................... 44 
A.1.10  Carnegie Mellon Ethics Hotline  .......................................................................................... 45 
A.1.11  Policy Against Retaliation  .................................................................................................... 45 
A.2 Key Offices for Academic & Research Support  ....................................................................... 45 
A.2.1  Computing and Information Resources ............................................................................ 45 
A.2.2  Student Academic Success Center  ..................................................................................... 46 
A.2.3  University Libraries ................................................................................................................ 46 
A.2.4  Research at CMU  .................................................................................................................... 47 
A.2.5  Office of Research Integrity & Compliance  ..................................................................... 47 
A.3 Key Offices for Health, Wellness & Safety  ............................................................................... 47 
A.3.1  Counseling & Psychological Services ................................................................................ 47 
A.3.2  Health Services  ........................................................................................................................ 47 LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 8 
 A.3.3  Campus Wellness  ................................................................................................................... 48 
A.3.4  Religious and Spiritual Life Initiatives (RSLI)  ................................................................ 48 
A.3.5  University Police  ..................................................................................................................... 48 
A.3.6  Shuttle and Escort Services  .................................................................................................. 49 
A.4 The WORD  ....................................................................................................................................... 49 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
  
  LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 9 
 1  Introduction  
Welcome to the Language Technologies Institute, a graduate department in the School of 
Computer Science at Carnegie Mellon University. You have joined a Ph.D. program that focuses on excellence, creativity, and training the next generation of research leaders. While the next few 
years will be a time of hard work and intense concentration, we hope that your time at the LTI 
will also be rewarding professionally and personally.  
Obtaining a Ph.D. is a long and often intense journey. A healthy work -life balance helps to keep it 
in perspective. Carnegie Mellon  is located in Pittsburgh, a city with a rich industrial and labor 
heritage. In the past, it was the heart of the U.S. steel industry, a source  for quality packaged foods, 
an important financial hub, and an early pioneer in railroads, radio, and nuclear power. This is a 
city where people worked hard and made things that changed the world. Today, Pittsburgh has 
reinvented itself as a leader in Computer Science and medicine, but it is still a place where people 
work hard and make things that change the world . It is also an informal city, where people don’t 
take themselves too seriously and remember to have fun. It is home to excellent museums, competitive professional sports teams, inexpensive magic shows, and free music during the 
summer, with skiing and magnificent  state parks nearby. Your stay here will be more rewarding 
if you make time for e xploring  the many activities that Pittsburgh and Southwest Pennsylvania 
have to offer. 
There are significant differences between CMU's different departments and degree programs in 
philosophical approach, procedures, policies, and regulations. Each department issues a 
handbook that informs graduate students of their program requirements and procedures and 
ensures that students have written access to standard information. This handbook describes the 
policies, procedures, and requirements for the Ph.D.  in Language and Information Technologies.  
All policies not explicitly described in this document conform to School of Computer Science (SCS) policies and university policies. For information about Carnegie Mellon requirements and policies, please see the university’s handbook The Word
, the Office of Graduate and Postdoctoral 
Affairs web page , the Office of the Dean of Students web page , and other resources contained in 
Appendix A of this handbook.  
Welcome! We hope that your time here is a life -changing experience.  
1.1 Degrees Offered  
The Language Technologies Institute offers two Ph.D. programs and four Master degrees.  
• Ph.D.  in Language and Information Technologies (LTI Ph.D. ) 
• Dual -Degree Ph.D. in Language and Information Technologies (CMU -PT Ph.D.)  
• Masters in Language Technologies (MLT)  
• Master of Science in Intelligent Information Systems (MIIS)  
• Master of Computational Data Science  (MCDS)  
• Master of Science in Artificial Intelligence and Innovation  (MSAII)  LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 10 
 This handbook applies to the LTI Ph.D.  
The Ph.D.  in Language and Information Technologies (LTI Ph.D. ) is focused on understanding 
and extending the state of the art in computational linguistics, natural language processing, 
dialogue systems, information retrieval, machine translation, speech processing,  video 
understanding, multimodal systems, automated reasoning, and other topics related to analysis 
and understanding of unstructured information  (e.g., machine learning, and software engineering 
of intelligent systems).  
1.2 Department Personnel 
The people responsible for administering the LTI Ph.D.  degree are:  
Jamie Callan  
Ph.D. Program Director  
Professor  
GHC 5419 
callan@cs.cmu.edu  
412-268-4525  Stacey Young  
Ph.D. Academic Program Manager  
LTI Graduate Program Manager  
GHC 6415  
staceyy@cs.cmu.edu   
412-268-2623  
Mona Diab  
LTI Director  
Professor  
GHC 5723 
mdiab@andrew.cmu.edu  
412-268-3669  
 
Joan Axelson  
Office Manager  
GHC 5405  
jaxelson@andrew.cmu.edu  
412-268-7517  
 Julie Nys  
Employment Processes Manger  
GHC 5405  
jnys@andrew.cmu.edu  
412-268-3515  
1.3 University Policies and Expectations 
It is the responsibility of each member of the Carnegie Mellon community to be familiar with university policies and guidelines. In addition to this departmental graduate student handbook, the following resources are available to assist you in understanding community expectations. 
• The Word/Student Handbook:  
https://www.cmu.edu/student-a ffairs/theword//index.html
 
• Academic Integrity Policy:   
https:// www.cmu.edu/policies/student -and- student -life/academic-
integrity.html LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 11 
 • University Policies Website:   
https://www.cmu.edu/policies/  
• Office of Graduate and Postdoctoral Affairs:  
https://www.cmu.edu/graduate/policies/index.html  
Due to the changing nature of conditions and expectations surrounding public health and safety 
requirements please visit https:// www.cmu.edu/coronavirus/  for the most up to date information.
 Please see Appendix A for additional information about The Word and University 
resources. 
1.4 The Academic Calendar  
The Academic calendar can be found at https://www.cmu.edu/hub/calendar/index.html  and 
provides information on all deadlines, including registration dates, class start dates, add/drop deadlines, exam dates, and more.   
Some doctoral course -sections follow a separate Academic Calendar . 
1.5 Carnegie Mellon University Statement of Assurance  
Carnegie Mellon University does not discriminate in admission, employment, or administration 
of its programs or activities on the basis of race, color, national origin, sex, handicap or disability, 
age, sexual orientation, gender identity, religion, creed, ancestry, belief, veteran status, or genetic information.  Furthermore, Carnegie Mellon University does not discriminate and is required not 
to discriminate in violation of federal, state, or local laws or executive orders.  
Inquiries concerning the application of a compliance with this statement should be directed to 
the university ombuds person , Carnegie Mellon University, 5000 Forbes Avenue, Pittsburgh, PA 
15213 (412 -268-1018). Obtain general information about Carnegie Mellon University by calling 
412-268-2000.  
Carnegie Mellon University publishes an annual campus security and fire safety report describing 
the university’s security, alcohol and drug, sexual assault,  and fire safety policies, and containing 
statistics about the number and type of crimes committed on campus, and the number and cause of fires in campus residence facilities during the preceding three years. You can obtain a copy by contacting the Carnegie Mellon Police Department at 412 -268-2323. The annual security and fire 
safety report also is available online at www.cmu.edu/police/annualreports
 . 
Information regarding the applicable grievance procedures for alleged violations 
of the Statement of Assurance is available at 
https://www.cmu.edu/policies/forms -and-documents/soa- violations.pdf .   
The Office for Institutional Equity and Title IX may be reached at 412 -268-7125  LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 12 
 or  institutionalequity@cmu.edu . 
1.6 The Carnegie Mellon Code 
Students at Carnegie Mellon, because they are members of an academic community dedicated to 
the achievement of excellence, are expected to meet the highest standards of personal, ethical,  and 
moral conduct possible.  
 These standards require personal integrity, a commitment to honesty without compromise, as 
well as truth without equivocation and a willingness to place the good of the community above the good of the self. Obligations once undertaken must be met, commitments kept.  
 As members of the Carnegie Mellon community, individuals are expected to uphold the standards of the community in addition to holding others accountable for said standards. It is rare that the 
life of a student in an academic community can be so private that it will not affect the community 
as a whole or that the above standards do not apply.  
The discovery, advancement and communication of knowledge are not possible without a commitment to these standards. Creativity cannot exist without acknowledgment of the creativity of  others. New knowledge cannot be developed without credit for prior knowledge. 
Without the ability to trust that these principles will be observed, an academic community cannot exist.  
The commitment of its faculty, staff and students to these standards con tributes to the high 
respect in which the Carnegie Mellon degree is held. Students must not destroy that respect by 
their failure to meet these standards. Students who cannot meet them should voluntarily 
withdraw from the university.  
The Carnegie Mellon C ode can also be found here: 
https://www.cmu.edu/student-
affairs/theword/ . 
2 The Language Technologies Institute  
2.1 Pittsburgh Campus Location  
The Language Technologies Institute is located primarily on the 5th and 6th floors of the  Gates 
Hillman Complex (GHC) on Carnegie Mellon’s Pittsburgh campus.  The address and contact 
information of the LTI are  shown below.  
Language Technologies Institute  
Carnegie Mellon University  
5000 Forbes Avenue  
Gates Hillman Complex  
Pittsburgh, PA 15241 -3891  LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 13 
 412-268-6298 (fax)  
http://www.lti.cs.cmu.edu/   
 
Office locations for faculty, staff, and Ph.D. students can be found on the LTI website.  
2.2 Office Space 
Most Ph.D. students in residence on the Pittsburgh campus are given an office in which to study 
and do research. Typically, offices are shared with other Ph.D. students, but they may also be shared with staff, visitors, or other members of the LTI. 
Offices are assigned by the LTI’s Office Manager (see Section 1.2 , Department Personnel, for 
contact information).  
2.3 Mailboxes and Office Supplies  
Mailboxes and office supplies are in GHC 5404.  
2.4 Photocopies and Printers  
Printers and photocopies are available to LTI students. The use of a photocopier or printer 
requires you to log in with your CMU ID card. LTI students may use printers/photocopiers 
scattered throughout the School of Computer Science buildings , but the machines in GHC 5404 
and GHC 6604  are the most convenient . The SCS Computing Facilities  publishes a list of printers 
online at https://computing.cs.cmu.edu/desktop/printer -list. 
2.5 Computers for LTI Ph.D.  Students  
Ph.D. students are responsible for having their own laptop computers to support their education 
and research. Students are free to choose their own operating system (e.g., Linux, MacOs, 
Windows).  
Many Ph.D. advisors also provide access to computer clusters, cloud computing, or other resources to support computationally -intense research.  
Ph.D. students are given access to the LTI’s computer cluster on an as- needed basis, to be used for 
course assignments, directed study projects, and/or capstone projects.  The LTI cluster provides 
storage and computation for projects involving large datasets and/or lengthy computation.  
Ph.D. students receive two types of user ids: An Andrew id and a CS id. All CMU students have 
an Andrew id. Computer Science students also have a CS id that provides access to SCS -specific 
resources (e.g., computer clusters). CS ids are being phased out very slowly, so it is likely that you will need both types of user id.  LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 14 
 The School of Computer Science has a Help Center in GHC 4201 . It can be contacted at 
help@cs.cmu.edu  , extension 8 -4231 from a campus phone, or 412 -268-4231 from an outside line  
(M- F, 9am- 5pm) . 
3 Standard Degree Requirements & Degree Certification                                        
3.1 LTI Ph.D. Degree Requirements  
To complete the Ph.D.  in Language and Information Technologies degree, the student must satisfy 
the following requirements:  
• Pass at least 96  units of graduate level courses, with additional requirements detailed 
below ; 
• Satisfy proficiencies in Writing, Presentation, Programming, and Teaching ; 
• Propose , write, and defend a Ph.D.  dissertation (thesis) ; 
• Attend the LTI Colloquium (11 -700) each semester ; and 
• Satisfy the Research Speaking Requirement.   
The sections below provide more detail about each of these requirements.  
3.1.1 Course Requirements  
To complete the course requirements for the Ph.D. in Language and Information Technologies 
degree, the student must pass 96  or more course units of graduate courses, and meet the following 
criteria:  
• At least 72 units of “LTI” courses and 24  units of “SCS” courses, 
• At least one class in each “LTI Focus Area”, and  
• At least two labs, in two different research areas . 
For definitions of quoted terms, see the section on “Definitions of LTI Terminology”.  
Unless approved by the Program Director in advance, the course requirements must be satisfied 
by actual classroom courses, not credit given for research or independent study.  
An “LTI course ” is any 12 -unit course with a number of 11 -XXX; a  6-unit course with 11 -XXX 
counts as one- half of an LTI course. Unless otherwise specified, "course" means an actual 
classroom course, not  credit given for research or independent study. Note that the LTI  allow s 
any one MLD (10 -XXX) graduate course to count as an "LTI course".  
An “SCS course” is any 12 -unit course with a course number indicating a unit of the School of 
Computer Science (including LTI); a 6 -unit course with such a number counts as one -half of an 
SCS course. Unless otherwise specified, "course" means an actual classroom course, not credit given for research or independent study. Note: Recommended electives that are technically  LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 15 
 outside of the SCS now count towards this requirement; for example, Digital Signal Processing in 
ECE. Please see the Program Director for approval of electives as “SCS.”  
“LTI Focus Areas” are sets of courses defined on the LTI course webpage under “Course Categories.” If a student believes a new course should be added to a Focus Area, they should make a request to  the Ph.D. Program Director . They  will decide, with advice from faculty in the 
appropriate area, whether it should be in the Focus Area. I f approved , it will be added to the LTI 
Focus Area webpage.  
A “Task -Orientation Focus Course ” is a course belonging to that LTI Focus Area, as listed on 
the LTI’s “Course Categories” webpage.  
An LTI “ lab course ” is a course in the list of lab courses defined o n the LTI ’s “Course Categories” 
webpage . 
3.1.2 Grade Requirements  
Students must demonstrate their mastery of material taught in courses and their success in applying their skills in directed stu dy by satisfying the following grade requirements . 
Minimum grade:  Only courses with a grade of B (3.0) or higher are counted as satisfying a degree 
requirement. 
Pass/fail:  Pass/fail grades are not permitted for courses and projects used to satisfy a degree  
requirement. 
3.1.3 Proficiency Requirements  
The LTI Ph.D.  does not require any Qualifying Exams.  Instead, a LTI Ph.D.  student is required to 
demonstrate proficiency in the following four areas.  
• Writing: This is satisfied by producing a peer -reviewed conference paper, or the 
equivalent (a written report that at least two SCS faculty certify as being of conference -
paper quality).  
 
• Presentation: This is satisfied by the oral presentation of a conference paper, or the 
equivalent (an oral presentation that at least t wo SCS faculty certify as being of 
conference- talk quality).  
 
• Programming:  This is satisfied by demonstrating competence in computer programming 
of language technology; this is normally satisfied in the course of the student's research 
and/or project work.  
 LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 16 
 • Teaching:  This is satisfied by two (2) successful Teaching Assistantships ( TA-ships), as 
determined by the faculty member for whom the student serves as TA . Typically,  one of 
these will be for an undergraduate class, and one for a graduate -level class. O ne of the two 
TA-ships may be in some form of pre -approved "alternate service", such as an SCS “v -unit .”  
 
The Program Coordinator must be notified in advance of a TA-ship,  or it may not be accepted .  
Graduate students are required to have a certain level of fluency in English before they can instruct in Pennsylvania, as required by the English Fluency in Higher Education Act of 1990. Through this 
Act, all institutions of higher education in the state are required to evaluate and certify the English 
fluency of all instructional personnel, including teaching assistants and interns. The full university policy can be reviewed at:  
https://www.cmu.edu/policies/faculty/evaluation -certification -english -fluency -instructors.html
 
The fluency of all instructional personnel will be rated  by Language Support in the Student 
Academic Success Center to determine at what level of responsibility the student can TA.  
In addition to administering the International Teaching Assistant (ITA) Test (a mandatory 
screening test for any non- native speake r of English), Language Support in the Student Academic 
Success Center helps teaching assistants who are non -native English speakers develop fluency 
and cultural understanding to teach successfully at Carnegie Mellon. Visit the Student Academic Success Center website for additional information:  
https://www.cmu.edu/student- success/
 
3.1.4 The Ph.D. Dissertation  
The Ph.D.  dissertation is the defining feature of a Ph.D.  degree. The process of completing a Ph.D. 
dissertation has three important milestones. 
• Thesis Topic : During the Ph.D.  student’s third year, the student should be working hard 
to find a thesis topic. The thesis topic typically develops from the directed research that 
the student has been carrying out with the student’s advisor.  The topic is a well- defined 
research proble m that is interesting and unsolved, and for which the student has a 
believable proposed solution.  When the dissertation is finished, there will be a “thesis 
statement” that describes the claimed solution to the research problem that is the thesis 
topic.  
 
• Thesis Proposal:  Near the end of the student’s third year, the student will compose a 
dissertation proposal. In this document, the student will specify the problem the research addresses (the thesis topic); the significance of the problem and expected scie ntific 
contributions; other relevant research, including competing approaches; some preliminary results; the work that still must be completed; evaluation metrics for that work; and a LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 17 
 projected timeline for completion. Before presenting the proposal, the student will also 
secure approval for a dissertation committee, which consists of the student’s advisor, at least two other SCS faculty members working in language technologies, and at least one external member.  
 University rules require that the time and place of the proposal presentation be publicly announced at least one week before the presentation. The student should coordinate this with the Ph.D.  Program Coordinator. The public thesis proposal protects the student by 
guaranteeing that the proposed research is interesting to the larger scientific community and demonstrating that the student will finish the program if the work is completed as outlined.  
 
• Thesis Defense:  The dissertation document itself, normally expected at the end of the fifth 
year, will include a detailed description of all the work done, including a clear evaluation 
and a discussion of its scientific contributions. There are no fixed style or document length guidelines or requirements; the only format requirement is that the title page should be suitable to be issued as an LTI Technical Report. The dissertation defense is a public 
presentation and defense of the dissertation results.  
 
Note: University rules again require that the time and place of the dissertation defense be publicly an nounced at least one week prior to the defense. This should also be coordinated 
with Ph.D.  Program Coordinator.   
 Note: At the time of the public announcement, a draft of the thesis document must be 
made available online.  
3.1.5 Research Speaking Requirement  
To emphasize student research, improve public speaking skills and increase internal awareness of LTI work, all LTI Ph.D.  students must complete an oral presentation at the LTI each year (by 
the end of May). The presentation should consist of a 20- minute ta lk plus time for discussion. It 
must be advertised to the LTI mailing lists at least one week before your presentation, and the public will be invited. (The thesis proposal and defense each count towards this requirement.)  
At least two LTI faculty members will attend the presentation, including the research advisor. 
After the presentation, these faculty members will convene and provide written feedback to both the student and the Program Director  of graduate programs (the form for this is available on the 
LTI website). This feedback will help the student refine speaking skills with respect to talk 
structure, content,  and delivery.  
3.2 Advising  
Each student has a faculty advisor charged with guiding the education and monitoring the 
progress of the student through the program. The advisor also supervises the student's directed LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 18 
 study projects. This personal student -advisor relationship ensures that every student receives the 
necessary faculty mentoring. The advisor also provides the student with career advice.  
How a nd when the advisor is selected  (The Matching  Process) : Advisors are selected during 
the first month of the program. Students are expected to attend the LTI's Orientation lectures,  
(Section 3.3) in which faculty describe their interests and areas of expertise, and to be proactive 
about meeting individually with potential advisors. After meeting with several potential advisors, 
each student will be asked to indicate a first, second and third choice for advisor. Meanwhile,  the 
potential advisors determine how many new students they can take and  indicate their 
preferences. Finally, the entire LTI faculty meets as a " Matching  Committee" to determine the best 
set of matches.  
Until a student finds a specific advisor, the Progr am Director  of the LTI graduate programs serves 
as the advisor.  
How to change advisors:  The initial advisor selection should be made carefully. However, it is 
possible to change advisors. To do so, the student should find another faculty member willing to 
serve as an advisor, and then make a request to the Program Director to switch advisors. The LTI 
follows the long- standing SCS policy that both the new and old advisors need to agree to the 
change; typically, this is not a problem (assuming the new advisor  has agreed in advance, as 
described here). It is to the student's advantage to avoid switching advisors, especially late in their graduate studies, because forging a strong student -advisor relationship takes time.  
3.3 LTI Orientation  
At the beginning of each Fall semester, the LTI provides 2 -3 weeks of lectures and talks to help 
students learn about the work done by CMU faculty and to provide an opportunity for advisors to recruit new students. Students are expected to attend them and treat them as seriously a s a 
standard course, because they provide a good introduction to the broad range of research done at 
the LTI. Students do not register for the LTI Orientation, nor do they receive a grade; however, the department is serious about its expectation that new students will attend these talks.  
For many years, these talks were called "the Immigration Course (IC)." The intuition behind this 
name is that the talks help orient newly -arrived students – immigrants into the CMU 
environment. As a result, some students u nderstood the name to indicate that the talks would be 
about US immigration and visa requirements. The older name has been retired; however, people who have been at CMU a long time may occasionally use the older name . 
3.4 End of Semester Evaluation  
Near the e nd of each semester, the student must prepare a statement that describes his or her 
achievements in the current semester and plans for the next semester.  
At the end of the semester, the faculty evaluates each student's academic progress. The student's 
advisor serves as the student's advocate in this process. The result of the evaluation is a letter from LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 19 
 the faculty to the student that indicates whether the student is making satisfactory progress 
towards completing the degree.  
A good letter typically indicates that the student is making satisfactory progress. If the student is doing exceptionally good work, a stronger adjective such as excellent might be used, but this is unusual.  
If a student seems to be having trouble, the faculty determines whether it believes that the student 
can finish the degree, and if so, what needs to be accomplished to get back on track. This type of 
letter should be considered a serious warning. It is not a permanent "black mark" on the student's record; if the student begins makin g satisfactory progress again, there is no official record of the 
letter in the student's transcript. 
In the most serious cases, the faculty gives the student an “N -1” letter that specifies a list of 
conditions that the student must satisfy by specific deadlines. Failure to meet all t he specified 
conditions may result in the student's termination from the program.  
3.5 Electives Outside of SCS  
Students may  take elective courses outside the SCS, at Carnegie Mellon or cross -registered at the 
University of Pittsburgh, as long as the student fulfills the requirements of their program as 
described above. The student should discuss any such electives in advance w ith their advisor . 
Typical choices might include ECE courses for Speech students, Pitt Linguistics courses, or 
Statistics courses.  
Students interested in taking recommended electives outside the SCS should pay particular 
attention to the following issues. 
• Recommended electives outside of the SCS count towards the “SCS” course requirement. Please see the Program Director for approval of an elective as an “SCS  course” .  
• Students need advance approval for any courses not covered by their normal tuition (e.g.,  
summer courses).  
• The grading of outside courses is the responsibility of the department offering the course; however, the LTI's Minimum Course Grade Policy described above still applies (“B” is the minimum for Ph.D. ).  
3.6 Completing a n M.S. Degree Enroute t o a Ph.D. 
Courses that satisfy LTI Ph.D. degree requirements may also be used to satisfy requirements for 
one M.S. degree. The most common choice is the LTI’s Master of Language Technologies (MLT) 
degree because its requirements are similar (but not identical) to the Ph.D. requirements. Other M.S. degrees within the LTI and outside of the LTI are also possible.  LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 20 
 Students interested in an M.S. degree other than the MLT degree should  discuss their plans with 
their Ph.D. advisor due to the additional courses and project work that may be involved.  
3.7 Grading and Evaluation  
3.7.1 University Policy on Grades  
Carnegie Mellon’s Grading  policy offers details concerning university grading principles for 
students taking courses and covers the specifics of assigning and c hanging grades, grading 
options, drop/ withdrawals, and course repeats.   It also defines the undergraduate and graduate 
grading standards.  
Process for Appealing Final Grades  
Final grades will be changed only in exceptional circumstances and only with the approval of the 
instructor and the department, unit, or program.  
Grading is a matter of sound discretion of the instructor and final grades are rarely changed without the consent of the instructor who assigned the grade. The following circumstances are 
the unusual exceptions that may warrant a grade appeal: (a) the final grade assigned for a course 
is based on manifest error (e.g., a clear error such as arithmetic error in computing a grade or 
failure to grade one of the answers on an exam), or (b) the faculty or staff member who assigned the grade did so in violation of a university  policy.  
See the university’s Summary of Graduate Student Appeal and Grievance Procedures
 web page 
for more information.  https://www.cmu.edu/student -affairs/theword/academic/appeal -of-
grades -and-academic- actions.html  
3.7.2 University Policy on Grades for Transfer Courses  
https://www.cmu.edu/policies/student- and-student -life/transfer- credit -
evaluation -and-assignment.html  
Carnegie Mellon University offers students the opportunity to take courses for credit through a cross- registration program (see Pittsburgh Council on Higher Education (PCHE) and Cross-
registration below) and through the receipt of transfer credit from othe r accredited institutions. 
The Carnegie Mellon University transcript will include information on such courses as follows: Carnegie Mellon courses and courses taken through the university's cross -registration program 
will have grades recorded on the transcr ipt and be factored into the QPA. All other courses will 
be recorded on this transcript indicating where the course was taken, but without grade. Such courses will not be taken into account for academic actions, honors or QPA calculations.  
 LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 21 
 3.8 Academic Integrity  
In the midst of self- exploration, the high demands of a challenging academic environment can 
create situations where some students have difficulty exercising good judgment. Academic 
challenges can provide many opportunities for high standards to evolv e if students actively reflect 
on these challenges and if the community supports discussions to aid in this process. It is the 
responsibility of the entire community to establish and maintain the integrity of our university.  
Carnegie Mellon University edu cates its students to become professionals who will serve society 
with integrity. The university also creates and disseminates new knowledge and expressions of 
knowledge in ways that benefit society.  
Carnegie Mellon strives to serve the changing needs of society through the three primary goals outlined in its mission statement: T o create and disseminate knowledge and art through research 
and artistic expression, teaching and learning and transfer to society; to serve students by teaching them leadership, problem- solving skills, and the values of quality, ethical behavior, 
responsibility to society and commitments to work; and to pursue the advantages provided by a 
diverse community, open to the exchange of ideas, where discovery and artistic creativity can  
flourish.  
In any presentation, creative, artistic or research, it is the ethical responsibility of each student to 
identify the conceptual sources of the work submitted. Failure to do so is dishonest and is the basis for a charge of cheating or plagiarism, which is subject to disciplinary action.  
Please review the University Policy on Academic Integrity
. 
The policy includes the University expectations around academic integrity and provides 
definitions of cheating, plagiarism, and unauthorized assistance.  
A review of the University’s Academic Disciplinary Actions  procedures is also recommended.  
Important note: The LTI implements the above policy’s option of “conven[ing] a disciplinary 
hearing according to the procedures of the department/program.” Our procedure is as follows: A first violation is grounds for dismissal from the graduate program. If we decide not to immediately dismiss, the first violation will result in the student being on disciplinary probation.  
If the student commits a second violation while on probation, the penalty is dismissal from the 
graduate program. 
These procedures outline the process for investigating, reporting, and adjudicating violations of 
the University Policy on Academic Integrity. The procedures also outline the appeal process.  
Please see the Appeals of Course Level Action section  of The Word and the 
Office of Community 
Standards & Integrity w eb page for more information.  LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 22 
 3.9 Withdrawal of a Degree 
The University reserves the right to withdraw a degree even though it has been granted should 
there be discovery that the work upon which it was based or the academic records in support of it had been falsified. In such a case, withdrawal of the degree will occur promptly upon discovery of the falsification. See the university’s Withdrawal of a Degree
 policy for more information.  
3.10 Employment Eligibility Verification  
If you are receiving a stipend, are a TA, or are planning to have a position with CMU then Employment Eligibility Verification is required. Form I -9 must be completed within 3 business 
days of beginning work for any type of compensation (stipend or employment). Additional details are highlighted below. To ensure compliance with federal law, Carnegie Mellon University 
maintains the Employment Eligibility Verification (I- 9) Policy [pdf] covering the university’s 
I-9 and E -Verify requirements : 
• Every individual receiving a stipend from CMU or employed by CMU must comply with 
the I -9 Policy by completing the Form I -9 within three business days following the first 
day of stipend start date/employment.  
• Individuals who expect to work on a federally  funded project are further responsible for 
submitting an E -Verify Processing Request Form to the Office of Human Resources if 
required.  
• For more information, please see CMU’s Guidance for Completing the Form I -9 and E -
Verify Requirements at CMU [pdf] , or visit the Human Resources Service website to 
learn more about Form I -9 and E -Verify and to schedule an appointment to complete the 
Form I -9. 
• Students who fail to complete the Form I -9 in a timely manner may have stipend payments 
suspended.   If employed by the university, an individual who fails to timely complete the 
Form I -9 may be subject to disciplinary action up to and including termination of 
employment.  
For more information : 
• See CMU’s Guidance for Completing the Form I -9 and E -Verify Requirements at CMU , 
or 
• Visit the Human Resources Service website to learn more about Form I -9 and E -Verify  
and to schedule an appointment to complete the Form I -9.” 
3.11 Additional Guidance for Students  LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 23 
 3.11.1 Program of Study   
Students seeking guidance about their program of study and degree requirements should consult 
with their academic advisor and/or appropriate associate dean.  
3.11.2  Financial Aid and Student Account   
Students are expected to make normal progress toward their degree in order to graduate within the standard timeframe for their program of study. Under U.S. Federal Title IV regulations, student eligibility for federal financial aid is contingent upon enrollment in and successful completion of courses that are counted as credit toward their current degree program. To receive the maximum amount of federal financial aid for which they may be eligible, students must enroll each se mester in at least 36 units that count toward their current degree level. (See separate 
guidance regarding integrated degree completion.)   
Students should consult with their designated college liaison in The HUB regarding billing and financial aid, particu larly for early completion, longer -than -standard completion, or integrated 
undergraduate and master’s degree programs.    
3.11.3  International Students  
Immigration status for students in F- 1 and J- 1 non -immigrant status is tied to making normal 
progress toward completing degree requirements. Therefore, F -1 and J -1 students who are 
considering completing their degree requirements early, anticipating longer -than -standard 
completion, or moving from an undergraduate to a graduate student classification (integ rated 
undergraduate -graduate study) should consult with their designated advisor in the Office of 
International Education (OIE) to ensure compliance with immigration regulations.  
4 Ph.D.  Academic Policies  
4.1 Duration of Study  
The target duration of the LTI Ph.D.  is five years, although six years is also common.  
Carnegie Mellon graduate students are expected to complete their degree requirements within the standard length of time for their program of study as outlined in this Graduate Student Handbook. Upon completion of the graduate program degree requirements, the degree will be certified by the student’s academic program in the semester in which the student completes the 
requirements.  
Early Completion  
The Ph.D. is granted when  all degree requirements are satisfied. Some students complete the 
program in fewer than five years.  LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 24 
 Extended or Longer- than -Standard Competition  
Longer- than -standard degree completion may occur due to academic interruptions in making 
progress toward the d egree as defined by the academic program, interruptions of full -time study 
or progress towards the degree due to serious, documented medical issues, or other unusual or 
unforeseen circumstances.  
Doctoral students who require an extended period to complete their degree requirements must consult with their academic program and  are subject to the CMU Policy on Doctoral Student 
Status (https://www.cmu.edu/policies/student -and-student -life/doctoral -student -status.html), 
specifically the “Time to Degree. ” 
4.1.1 Departm ent Policy on Double Counting Courses  
An LTI Ph.D.  student who uses courses taken as a M aster ’s degree student (at Carnegie Mellon 
or elsewhere) toward their program requirements cannot use those same courses toward any 
other Master’s degree offered by the school . The LTI (like other SCS units) allows its Ph.D.  
students who have passed the requirements for an LTI Master’s degree to receive the master’s  
degree without any additional work. Any other sharing of coursework by an LTI student between 
more than on e CMU degree (e.g., receiving an MLD Master’s  degree that includes courses taken 
as an LTI Ph.D.  student) must be explicitly approved by the LTI, on a case -by-case basis, in 
advance.  
4.1.2 External Internships  
The LTI provides summer support for its Ph.D.  students, so Ph.D. students are expected to do 
research at Carnegie Mellon during the summer. However, outside experience can be a valuable 
educational experience, Ph.D. students in good standing  are allowed to do an e xternal internship. 
Some  students may  benefit from more than one internship, especially if they require access to 
proprietary data for their work, thus , with the approval of the student’s advisor, a student can intern up 
to four (4) times during their Ph.D. degree. Interning more than four ( 4) times requires approval 
from the Ph.D. P rogram Director.  
Any internship must be planned in consultation with the student’s advisor and the LTI Ph.D.  
Coordinator. If an internship is part of a fully -funded external fellowship (e.g., Microsoft Research 
Fellowship), the student does not need prior LTI approval, but should still coordinate with their 
advisor. International students must consult with Office of International Education (OIE) for eligibility before seeking an internship or signing an offer contract.  
Internships are typically scheduled during the summer. In certain cases,  it is possible to schedule 
an internship during the fall or spring semester; the details are complex, especially for international students, so the student should discuss this as early as possible with the Ph.D. 
Program Director . International students must coordinate carefully with the LTI in any event, due 
to visa restrictions.  LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 25 
 Note that self- funded Ph.D.  students (e.g., those registered for five units while on semester 
interns hip) are not permitted to receive a partial stipend for the semester of their internship, while 
full- time LTI -sponsored students are eligible for a partial stipend.  
All students are caution ed to be aware of potential intellectual property (IP) problems with 
internships, and to review any IP agreements with their advisors before signing them. It is possible 
to lose ownership of your ideas.  
If the student is to receive academic credit for the internship,  it must have deliverables from the 
student commensurate with the number of units,  they are taking. This can be in the form of 
interim and final reports on the experience, presentations in the following semester regarding the experience, assessments of their experience as it relates to their course of study, etc.  
4.1.3 Maximum Courseload  
Ph.D.  students are permitted to register for a maximum of 54  units of coursework per semester.  
4.1.4 Pass/Fail Grades  
Pass/fail grades are not permitted for courses used to satisfy a degree requirement.  
Graduate students who are required to take additional undergraduate courses to build up the core 
foundations of computer science may not elect the pass/fail option for th ese courses.  
4.1.5 Transfer Credit  
An equivalent graduate course previously completed at another institution may be permitted to 
satisfy one of the Ph.D.  course requirements. The decision on whether a course may be transferred 
is made by the Ph.D.  Program Direct or.  
Typically,  the student will provide the Program Director with the syllabus of the external course, 
and the Program Director will use that and the student’s transcript to make the decision.  
See the section on “Definition of transfer credit versus cour se exemption .” 
A student may not receive transfer credit for more than four courses.  
4.1.6 Residency Requirements  
The university requires Ph.D. s to spend at least one year of residency at Carnegie Mellon.  
The SCS requires that all Ph.D.  students must take at Carnegie Mellon a minimum of 48  units of 
the total coursework required by their respective programs. LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 26 
 4.1.7 Transferring Into the Ph.D.  Program  
The LTI does not allow direct transfers from its master’s programs into its Ph.D.  program . The 
student must apply for the Ph.D.  at the usual time . However, students that are already enrolled in 
an LTI degree program are not required to retake GRE and TOEFL exams or to produce new 
transcripts from other universities.  
4.1.8 Transferring Out of the Ph.D.  Program  
The Ph.D.  program doe s not prevent students from transferring to another degree program . A 
student who is interested in transferring out of the Ph.D.  degree program should consult the 
handbook and Program Director of the desired degree program to learn whether transfers are permitted, and if so, how, and when to request such a transfer.  
4.2 LTI Academic Policies  
4.2.1 “Grandfather” Policy  
A student can graduate under the policies in effect at the time that the student entered the 
program; or, at the student's choice, the student can graduate under policies that are adopted after 
the student entered the program. If it is not realistic to follow a particular policy  exactly, the 
department may approximate the policy as closely as possible; this situation is rare and typically arises only when a student is enrolled in the program for an extended period of time.  
4.2.2 Definition of Transfer Credit  vs. Course Exemption  
The LT I may grant transfer credit  or issue an exemption for equivalent graduate courses previously 
completed at another institution. This decision rests with the director  of the particular program.  
If a student is exempt  from a required course due to prior cour ses or experience, the student can 
replace that course with an open elective. The student does not receive credit for the external course but  can take any course that could normally count toward the degree in its place.  
If a student receives credit  for pr ior coursework completed at CMU or elsewhere, the student 
receives that many units of credit, and the total amount of required coursework is reduced by that 
amount.  
4.2.3 External Employment/Consulting  
Students funded by LTI research projects are expected to wor k primarily for those projects. Since 
consulting provides useful experience, students are generally permitted to consult at most one 
day per seven- day week, with the advisor's consent . International students must also have 
approval in advance from the Office of International Education (OIE) ; otherwise, they may be in 
violation of their visa status. See also External Internships.  LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 27 
 4.2.4  Leave of Absence  
The LTI discourages Leaves of Absence (LOA), since students usually do not return, despite good 
intentions. However, a student in good standing may be granted a LOA of at most 1 year, upon written request to the Ph.D. Program Director and with consent of t he student's advisor. It is the 
responsibility of the student on LOA to contact the LTI to initiate a return to the program.  
Students taking or returning from a leave of absence must follow the university’s 
leave of absence 
process.  
4.2.5 Satisfactory Progress  
If a student does not make satisfactory progress each semester toward completing the degree, the  
LTI may remove the m from the program . See section on “End of Semester Evaluation .” 
4.2.6 Time Away from Academic Responsibilities  
Ph.D. s tudents that are supported by sponsored research, fellowships, or scholarships are 
expected to remain on campus and work fu lltime on their education and research throughout the 
year, regardless of whether classes are in session or not. 40 hours per week is a common level of 
effort.  
Ordinarily, students are not expected to work during official university holidays , however 
students may need to consult their advisor about expectations and alternate arrangements if there 
are challenges with taking time off during a university holiday, for example, if an experiment requires continuous monitoring. In such situations, the student and their advisor may agree for 
the student to take an equal number of days off at another time. 
Students with fulltime financial support are entitled to four weeks per  year of paid vacation , 
which must be scheduled in consultation with the ir advisor . 
4.3 CMU Academic Policies  
4.3.1 Drop/Add/Withdraw Procedures  
Add, drop, withdrawals, and pass/no pass election procedures and deadlines are described on a 
Hub web page . Note that the deadlines for doctoral courses may differ slightly; see the deadlines 
for doctoral course sections in the Academic Calendar .  
Doctoral students, visiting/non -degree students, and certificate students do not receive vouchers 
and do not participate in the voucher process.  LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 28 
 4.3.2 Doctoral Student Status 
Carnegie Mellon’s Policy for Doctoral Student Status  covers time limits on doctoral degree 
student status, a defi nition of All But Dissertation status, a definition of In Residence (ABD) and In 
Absentia  (ABS) status for doctoral students and the tuition and fees charged for students In 
Residence and students In Absentia . 
4.3.3 ABD versus ABD in Absentia (ABS)  
Following university policy, an LTI Ph.D.  student is considered "All -But-Dissertation" (ABD) 
when they have completed all requirements for the LTI's Ph.D.  degree except for the thesis defense 
(in particular, the student has had a thesis proposal accepted). Note that ABD status is different 
from ABD in absentia (ABS) status. A student in ABS status cannot receive any support from the university (including an y research projects within the university), cannot use most university 
facilities, and does not pay any tuition until they are ready to defend their thesis. ABS students must register for five (5) units of dissertation research in the semester they defend;  in keeping 
with university policy, the LTI (and its projects and faculty) cannot pay for these five units. The 
student can (and should) register for these five units only after they defend; just in case the defense 
date slips to the next semester.  
Student s entering ABD or ABS status must complete the All But Dissertations Status Agreement
. 
4.3.4 Statute of Limitations: Time to Degree  
As outlined in the Doctoral Student Status Policy , students will complete all requirements for the 
Ph.D. degree within a maximum of ten years from original matriculation as a doctoral student, or less if required by a more restrictive department or college policy. Once this time -to-degree limit 
has lapsed, the person may resume work towards a doctoral degree only if newly admitted to a currently offered doctoral degree program under criteria determined by that program. Under extraordinary circumstances, such as leave of absence, military or public service, family or parental leave, or temporary disability, a school or college may, upon the relevant departmen t's 
recommendation and with the written approval of the dean, defer the lapse of All But Dissertation status for a period commensurate with the duration of that interruption. Students, who are pursuing the Ph.D. degree as part- time students for all semesters of their program, as approved by 
their program, may also appeal to their program or department for extension of the time to degree limit.  
Under extraordinary circumstances, such as leave of absence, military or public service, family or parental leave, or temporary disability, a school or college may, upon the relevant department’s 
recommendation and with the written approval of the dean, defer the lapse of All But Dissertation status for a period commensurate with the duration of that interruption.  LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 29 
 Students, who are pursuing the Ph.D. degree as part- time students for all semesters of their 
program, as approved by their program, may also appeal to their program or department for 
extension of the time to degree limit.  
4.3.5 University  Financial Aid  
Graduate  students should consult the graduate student financial aid information  found on The 
HUB website.  Students will find the Graduate Financial Aid Guide, information about funding options and how to apply for financial aid and other helpful links.  
4.3.6 Assistance for Individuals with Disabilities  
The Office of Disability Resources at Carnegie Mellon University has a continued mission to 
provide physical, digital, and programmatic access to ensure that students with disabilities have 
equal access to their educational experience. We work to ensure that qualified individuals receive reasonable accommodations as guaranteed by the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) and Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973. Students who would like to receive accommodations can begin the process through Disability Resources'
 secu re online portal 
(https://rainier.accessiblelearning.com/cmu/ ) or email access@andrew.cmu.edu  to begin the 
interactive accommodation process. Students with physical, sensory, cognitive, or emotional disabilities are encouraged to self -identify with the Office of Disability Resources and request 
needed accommodations. Any questions about the process can be directed to 
access@andrew.cmu.edu  , or call (412) 268 -6121.   
4.3.7 Summary of Graduate Student Appeal and Grievance Procedures  
Graduate students will find the Summary of Graduate Student Appeal and Grievance Procedures  
on the Graduate Education Resource webpage.  This document summarizes processes available to 
graduate students who seek review of academic and non -academic issues. Generally, graduate 
students are expected to seek informal resolution of all concerns within the applicable department, unit, or program before invok ing formal processes. When an informal resolution 
cannot be reached, however, a graduate student who seeks further review of the matter is to follow the formal procedures outlined here . These appeal and grievance procedures shall apply to 
students in all graduate programs of the University. Students should refer to the department 
specific information in this handbook for department and college information about the 
administration and academic policies of the program.  
4.3.8 Sexual Misconduct Policy  
The University  prohibits sex -based discrimination, sexual harassment, sexual assault, dating/ 
domestic violence,  and stalking. The University also prohibits retaliation against individuals who 
bring forward such concerns or allegations in good faith.   LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 30 
 The University’s S exual Misconduct Policy is available at  
https://www.cmu.edu/policies/administrative -and-governance/sexual -misconduct/index.html  
The University’s Policy Against Retaliation is available at : 
https://www.cmu.edu/policies/administrative -and-governance/whistleblower.html  
If you have been impacted by any of these issues, you are encouraged to make contact with any of 
the following resources:  
• Office for Institutional Equity and Title IX : 412 -268-7125, 
institutionalequity@cmu.edu  
• On campus resources for institutional equity and Title IX   
• University Police : 412-268-2323  
 Additional resources and information can be found at: 
https://www.cmu.edu/title -ix/resources-
and-information/index.html  
4.3.9 Gestational and Parental Accommodations  
Providing holistic student support is a top priority at Carnegie Mellon. The protocols described 
at https://www.cmu.edu/graduate/programs -services/maternity -accommodation -protocol.html  
are designed to support the parental needs of students and their families.  
Students seeking any of the Parental Accommodations described below must register with 
the Office of the Dea n of Students by contacting the office for an appointment by calling 412 -
268- 2075.  
Students are encouraged to register with the Office of the Dean of Students ninety (90) days in 
advance of the anticipated arrival of the child as applicable in the individual circumstance.   At the 
time of registering, students will have the opportunity to consult about resources, procedures, funding options and preparation for discussing academic accommodations with the student’s academic department.   Students should also co nsult with their academic advisors either before or 
in conjunction with registering with the Office of the Dean of Students.  
4.3.10  Accommodations for Gestational Parents 
The birth of a child is a significant life event that may require time away from academic pu rsuits 
for delivery and recovery from delivery of a newly born child. Students whose anticipated delivery date is during the course of a semester may need to take time away from their academic responsibilities. Carnegie Mellon students seeking time away are afforded two options as possible accommodation:  
• Short -Term Accommodation for Gestational Parents  – A short term absence from 
academic responsibilities up to a maximum of six (6) weeks.   Short- Term Accommodation LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 31 
 may be extended by two (2) weeks, for a tot al of eight (8) weeks, where a longer absence 
is medically necessary. Prior to the absence students must work with relevant university 
faculty and staff to adjust their course work, research, teaching and other academic 
responsibilities during the period of absence. This may include extensions of time to 
complete assignments, incomplete grades, and/or dropping courses, shifting research 
responsibilities and adjusting TA assignments. Students who take a Short -Term 
Accommodation will remain enrolled.  
• Formal Leave of Absence – A formal leave of absence under the Student Leave Policy. 
Generally, the Student Leave Policy permits students to take a leave of absence for a full-
semester, mini- semester, or for the time remaining in the semester during which the leave 
is taken.   Students who take a Formal Leave of Absence 
(https://www.cmu.edu/policies/student- and-student -life/student- leave.html ) drop all 
remaining courses for the semester and are unenrolled for the semester. International 
students must consult with the Office of International Education 
(https://www.cmu.edu/oie/ ) before considering this option due to visa implications.  
4.3.11  Parental Accommodation for Doctoral Students    
The university offers a Parental Accommodation for qualifying doctoral student parents to include 
up to four (4) weeks of time away from academic responsibilities with continued stipend support. This accommodation can be utilized within six months of the birth or placement of a child 
through adoption, foster care or legal guardianship. Gestational parents may utilize both the 
Short- Term Accommodation  for Gestational Parents and the parental accommodation.  
Careful planning and consultation is necessary given the unique contexts and requirements of each student’s situation. Students will remain fully enrolled and will receive assistance in 
navigating the necessary planning and consultation processes.  
4.3.12  Financial Assistance for Student Parents 
Carnegie Mellon also offers the following options for financial assistance to students who become 
parents while enrolled:  
Interest Free Loan – Any student who becomes a parent is eligible to apply for an interest -
free parental loan  (https://www.cmu.edu/student -affairs/dean/loans/ ) from the Office of the Dean 
of Students.   
Doctoral Stipend Continuation (Gestational Parents) – Doctoral students who are the 
gestational parent and who receive an academic stipend funded by Carnegie Mellon are eligible to continue to receive stipend funding for up to six (6) weeks during a Short -Term 
Accommodation for Gestational Parents or during a Formal Leave of Absence. Continued LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 32 
 academic stipend funding may be extended by two (2) weeks, for a total of eight (8) weeks, if an 
absence longer than six weeks is medically necessary.   
Doctoral Sti pend Continuation (Non- gestational Parents) – Doctoral students who receive an 
academic stipend funded by Carnegie Mellon and are becoming a parent by adoption, birth, or through guardianship are eligible to continue to receive stipend funding for up to fo ur (4) weeks 
during a Short- Term Parental Accommodation.   
4.3.13   Consensual Intimate Relationship Policy Regarding Undergraduate 
Students   
This policy addresses the circumstances in which romantic, sexual  or amorous 
relationships/interactions with undergraduate students, even if consensual, are inappropriate and prohibited. The purpose of this policy is to assure healthy professional relationships. This policy is not intended to discourage consensual intimate relationships unless there is a conflicting professional relationship in which one party has authority over the other as in the policy.  
https://www.cmu.ed u/policies/student -and-student -life/consensual -relationships.html  
5 Financial Support  
5.1 Graduate Student Funding  
For all LTI Ph.D.  students, full funding (tuition plus stipend) is guaranteed for the first year . This 
support is normally continued for at least 5 years, with possibility of further continuance, subject to continuing satisfactory progress and availability of funding. The fellowship includes full tuition 
and fees, and a monthly Ph.D.  stipend that is fixed across SCS. In addition, the LTI pays a 
dependency allowance of 10% of the student's monthly stipend to any student with a child, unless they have a spouse who earns more than $200 per month.  
The impact of outside fellowships and scholarships on departmental support -decrease by the 
amount, added bonus, etc.  
If a Ph.D.  student receives an outside graduate fellowship (e.g., NSF, Fulbright), the student is 
expected to accept it in place of the LTI’s graduate fellowship. As an extra incentive to do so, the LTI will supplement the award so that the student will receive full tuition and a combined stipend 10 percent higher than that of the standard LTI graduate fellowship.  
Studen ts are required to inform the LTI about any external funding that they receive.  
See also the section on “ABD versus ABD in Absentia (ABS) ” (Section 4.3.3 ).  
5.2 Conference Travel Funding  LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 33 
 Students funded by research projects receive travel funding according to policies set by the 
individual projects. Students who have no project funding may be provided with partial funding, 
with a larger amount available for travel to p resent a refereed conference paper . There is an LTI 
form that must be filled out in advance. 
5.3 Research Funding  
GuSH Research Funding is a source of small research grant funds provided by the Graduate Student Assembly (GSA) and the Provost’s Office and manag ed by the Office of Graduate and 
Postdoc Affairs. See the Office of Graduate and Postdoctoral Affairs Research Grant Suppor
t page 
for information about the application process and deadlines.  
5.4 Office of the Dean of Students Emergency Support Funding 
Graduate students who find themselves in need of immediate funds for emergency situations 
should contact the Office of the Dean of Student s. All students , regardless of their program, are 
eligible for the Emergency Student Loan , which is an interest -free and emergency- based loan  
repayable within 30 days. It is available through the Office of the Dean of Student Affairs; students 
may apply for the loan by visiting the Office of the Dean of Students, located in Warner Hall 321 during business hours, by email at 
sa-esl@andrew.cmu.edu  or by calling (412) 268 -2075 for an 
appointment.  
5.5 Health Insurance  
Carnegie Mellon has a Student Health Insurance policy requiring full- time, degree seeking 
students to carry adequate medical insurance. Students must either purchase the plan offered by 
the University or an application for a waiver can be made if the student is “enrolled as the 
dependent, partner/spouse or principal in an employer or government -sponsored insurance 
plan .”(See  the Carnegie Mellon University Student Health Insurance Policy  (SHIP) ).  
It is the responsibility of each student to make arrangements with Student Health Services to 
either pay for their insurance at the beginning of the semester or  elect a payment plan over the 
course of the academic year. More information is available at the Student Health Services Web 
site. 
6 Additional University Resources  
6.1 The HUB Student Services Center  
thehub@andrew.cmu.edu and http://www.cmu.edu/hub/   
The HUB is located in Warner Hall, Lower Level.  The HUB staff delivers comprehensive service and counsel to students and families regarding financial aid, billing and payment,  ID cards, and 
registration  and academic records. The Assistant Directors in The HUB serve as contacts for LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 34 
 specific colleges and assist enrolled students with key aspects of the  enrollment process. Student 
can find their assigned HUB Assistant Director on their Student Information Online (SIO) 
Resource page . Questions that need specialized, in -depth attention can be directed to the 
student's assigned Assistant Director . For general questions and information, students may email 
The HUB or call 412 -268-8186. 
6.2 Student Information Online (SIO)  
Student Information Online (SIO) is a secure site where students can find important, personalized information, including E -Bills and student account information, financial aid status 
and eligibility, grades and QPA, and course schedules. Students can updat e their and their spouses 
or domestic partner's contact information, sign up for E -Check & E -Refund, authorize their 
spouses, domestic partners or other individual to receive a copy of their E -Bill, request 
verifications, view their housing and meal plan assignments, and much more. Students can log on to SIO by going to www.cmu.edu/hub/sio
 and entering their Andrew User ID and password.  
On SIO, students are encourage d to keep their current local address up to date. This supports a 
university initiative to have accurate living information for students for official program/department/college/university notices, the ability to facilitate wellness checks, ensure international students are in compliance with visa requirements.   
It will designate an emergency contact address of a relative or family friend to be contacted in the 
case of an emergency . If students do not want their name and address published in the campus 
directory, they must notify the HUB in writing.  
6.3 ID Cards  
Graduate students can obtain their ID card from The HUB once they have been entered into SIO for the semester. These cards identify their holders as members of the campus community . Student 
cards are deactivated upon the cardholder’s separation from the university.  
 Affiliate ID Cards are available for spouses and partners of graduate students that allow them to access Carnegie Mellon’s campus. These cards are available through The HUB to spouses and 
partners of grad uate students who are enrolled for the current academic year in a full- time 
graduate degree program . The card is valid for one year .  For information about domestic partner 
registration, visit the Office of the Dean of Students webpage : 
https://www.cmu.edu/student-
affairs/dean/domestic- partner/  . 
For more information about student and affiliate ID cards (spouse, domestic partners and dependent childre n), please visit: http://www.cmu.edu/idplus/idcards/sponsored.html
.  
 
 LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 35 
 6.4 Transcripts  
All units required for the Ph.D.  degree, whether earned in residence or tr ansferred from another 
institution, must be recorded on the transcript within ten years of the date on which the student 
enrolled in the program (CMU policy), or less if required by a more restrictive department, school, or college policy. This statutory p eriod can be extended by the SCS Associate Dean for Graduate 
Education for special circumstances that do not make it possible for the student to complete the requirements within the statutory period. Any request for a waiver of the statute of limitations for the Ph.D. degree must be approved by the Department Head and by the SCS Associate Dean 
for Graduate Education. The waiver request must explain the exceptional circumstances that warrant an extension. For cases in which a waiver is granted, the waiver wi ll cover specific 
courses and will specify a time period for completion of the program.  
See also the ‘Duration of Study’ policy.  
Information about and instructions for ordering transcripts are available at:  
https://www.cmu.edu/hub/registrar/student- records/transcripts/index.html
  
Transcript questions may be directed to cmuregistrar@andrew.cmu.edu . 
6.5 Pittsburgh Council on Higher Education (PCHE) and Cross -registrat ion 
https://www.cmu.edu/policies/student- and-student -life/cross- college -university -
registration.html  
Cross-r egistration provides an opportunity for enriched educational programs by permitting full -
time graduate students to cross- register for courses (usually no more than one per semester) at a 
Pittsburgh Council on Higher Educa tion (PCHE)  Insti tution.  
Full- time Carnegie Mellon degree students are eligible and the PCHE course may not count 
towards full -time status unless the student is enrolled in an inter- university program. Students 
interest ed in taking advantage of this opportunity should be familiar with the Policy on Grades 
for Transfer Courses already outlined previously in this handbook.  
6.6 Student Privacy Rights and FERPA 
https://www.cmu.edu/policies/student- and-student -life/privacy -rights -students.html   
 This university policy notifies students of their rights under the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (FERPA) . According to FERPA, students have the right to:  
• inspect and review their education records LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 36 
 • request an amendment to their education record if they believe they are inaccurate or 
misleading  
• request a hearing if their request for an amendment is not resolved to their satisfaction  
• consent to disclosure of personally identifiable information from their education records, 
except to the extent that FERPA authorizes disclosure without consent  
• file a complaint with the U.S. Department of Education Family Policy Compliance Office 
if they believe their rights under FERPA have been violated  
For questions about Student Privacy Rights, FERPA or filing a complaint, contact John 
Papinchak, University R egistrar, jp7p@andrew.cmu.edu , in Enrollment Services.  
6.7 Professional Development  
The Career and Professional Development Center (CPDC)  at Carnegie Mellon is a centralized 
career center staffed by a team of seasoned and highly -educated professionals who orchestrate the 
career exploration, experiential learning, and career networ king needs of students  and alumni.  
CMU's career and professional development model is grounded in discipline -specific career 
development, experiential learning, and employer relations shaped by strong connections with 
the university's seven academic colleg es. The center's success is founded upon a solid 
understanding of career and professional development theory, integration of technology, and an unwavering commitment to providing personalized attention towards meeting the unique individual needs of student s, alumni, and employers. The CDPC is located on the Lower Level of 
the University Center, 412 -268-2064 . 
The Office of the Assistant Vice Provost for Graduate Education (AVPGE) offers a robust schedule of professional development opportunities. Some are geared towards a specific 
population (master’s students, Ph.D.  students at the beginning of their program, graduate 
students seeking tenure track positions, etc.) and others are open to all graduate students (time management, balancing, staying healthy) . A full schedule of programs can be found at: 
http://www.cmu.edu/graduate/
. 
6.8 University Libraries  
http://search.library.cmu.edu  
There are three main libraries at Carnegie Mellon:  Hunt Library, Mellon Library,  and the Sorrells 
Library with the combined mission of providing access and help  to graduate students in finding 
the information needed, teaching graduate students to evaluate available information and use reliable sources. The libraries’ digital resources and services, including off -campus/ wireless 
access to databases and e -journals, offer online access. There are also two neighboring libraries 
open to Carnegie Mellon graduate students: Carnegie Library of Pittsburgh and University of Pittsburgh Libraries . Visit the University Libraries website for information about all mentioned 
library locations and hours, on -line resources,  and FAQ’s.  LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 37 
 6.9 Computing Services  
Computing Services  is located in Cyert Hall – Room 285.  Computing Services develops, 
maintains,  and supports the computing infrastructure for Carnegie Mellon students, faculty 
members and staff members. This includes the campus wired and wireless networks, public 
computer labs or “clusters,” cable television and telephone services, computing related 
docu mentation and support through the Help Center. In addition, Computing Services provides 
standard classroom technologies for over 100 lecture halls, classrooms,  and seminar rooms across 
campus.  The website contains addition information regarding The Help Ce nter hours, location 
and contact information, computing cluster hours and location, the Carnegie Mellon web portal, 
computing security and policies and guidelines. Students can email the Help Center at it -
help@cmu.edu or  call 412 -268-4357 (HELP) with questions and for assistance.  
6.10 Family and Dependents Resources 
The Graduate Student Assembly website maintains a resource page for spouses, domestic 
partners and families of graduate students: https://www.cmu.edu/stugov/gsa/Resources -for-
Graduate -Students/index.html  ,  i ncluding Th e Student Parent Association, new mother rooms, 
and links to resources around campus and the Pittsburgh area.  
Affiliate ID Cards are available for spouses and domestic partners of graduate students that allow 
them to access Carnegie Mellon’s campus. These cards are available through The HUB to spouses 
and partners of graduate students who are enrolled for the current academic year in a full- time 
graduate degree program . The card is valid for one year . For more information about student and 
affiliate ID cards, please visit: http://www.cmu.edu/idplus/idcards/sponsored.html . 
6.11 Domestic Partner Registration 
Carnegie Mellon extends certain benefits to domestic partners of students. Eligible students may 
elect benefits for their domestic partners through the registration process orchestrated by the Office of the Dean of Students , Warner Hall, room 321 . Information  regarding the benefits avail -
able for domestic partners, eligibility for domestic partner benefits, registration instructions and forms can be located at: 
https://www.cmu.edu/student -affairs/dean/domestic-
partner/index.html. 
6.12 Hou sing  
The university does not currently offer housing to graduate students .  The Office of Housing and 
Dining Services does provide  community housing information to assist graduate students who are 
seeking housing in the communities surrounding the university, including information on the legal aspects of renting an apartment, moving checklists and the off -campus housing database.  
This information can be located at:   https://www.cmu.edu/housing/our- communities/index.html
. 
 LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 38 
 6.13 Dining  
www.cmu.edu/dining/   
Dining services and operations are offered through the Office of Housing and Dining Services. The 
office operates dining locations open in and around campus. These  locations offer flexible hours 
with options from the early morning through late night.  The Dining Service website contains 
information about dining locations, hours of operation, graduate student dining plans forms, 
nutritional information, and daily specials for dining locations. ’ 
6.14 Parking and Transportation  
www.cmu.edu/parking/  
Graduate students will find information about parking and availability, parking policies, transportation options and Port Authority Transit usage with a valid university ID on the Parkin g 
and Transportation Services site . The Parking and Transportation Services office is located in the 
East Campus Garage (by Forbes Avenue entrance).  There is limited parking on campus and the varying permit rates can be found on the website . All parking a reas of campus are either by permit, 
metered or by the hour in the garage . Parking and Transportation Services will ticket any car 
parked in a permit area without a permit or at an expired meter . The city monitors the metered 
parking along Margaret Morrison, Frew and Tech Streets and will ticket at expired meters as well.  
The university offers shuttle and escort services operates in the evening/overnight and provides free transportation from campus to within a block of your home in the Oakland, Squirrel Hill,  and 
Shadyside neighborhoods, as well as to university  sites located outside of the main campus.  The 
Escort Service offers vehicle routes within a radius of campus between 6:30 pm- 4:15 am daily.  You 
must show your CMU ID to board.   
Information regard ing up -to-date shuttle and escort schedules, pick -up/drop- off locations, routes 
and usage policies can be found at: https://www.cmu.edu/parking/transport/escort.html
 .  
6.15 Copying, Printing, and Mailing Services  
Tartan Ink offers  community members easy access to UPS services, copy centers, printing and 
mailing services, and postal services. Tartan Ink is located on the Lower Level of the Cohon University Center.  More information regarding these services, business hours, locations and 
contact information can be foun d on the Office of Tartan Ink website at:  
https://www.cmu.edu/tartanink/aboutus/index.html
. 
6.16 University Center  
www.cmu.edu/university -center  
The Jared L. Cohon  University Center is a centerpiece of the campus that provides a space for 
special events, physical fitness, student organizations and various activities, as well as LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 39 
 accommodating retail and dining services. As the campus crossroads, the University Center 
functions as a place for students to interact, get involved and enjoy new experiences . Visit the 
University Center website for information about campus eateries, ATMs and PNC Bank, fitness rooms and schedules, retail stores, scheduling University Center space, the public prayer room, 
student organizations, and the Wright -Rogal Chapel.  
The University Center Information Desk (first floor of the Cohon Center next to Wean Commons 
and Kirr Commons) is the lo cation if you want to know about upcoming campus events or have 
questions about Carnegie Mellon in general, call the Information Desk at 412 -268-2107. The 
Information Desk not only provides information about campus events, but also sells postage stamps, makes copies, sends faxes, distributes campus maps, manages a lost & found, and has information brochures about Pittsburgh and the campus.  
6.17 Athletic/Fitness Facilities  
 www.cmu.edu/athletics  
For the participant or the spectator, Carnegie Mellon offers intercollegiate athletics, intramural 
sports, physical education classes and club sports. The Athletics Department also offers aerobics 
classes in the University Center as well as occasional workshops and instruction related to fitness and health . The administrative offices are located in the Cohon University Fitness Center . 
The University Center’s recreational facilities include an eight -lane pool, racquetball and squash 
courts, aerobics room, fitness center and gym for basketball and volleyball.  With renovations to 
Skibo Gym and the new Highmark Center for Health, Wellness , and Athletic s scheduled for 
completion in 2024, the strength and conditioning facility has been temporarily place d on the 
lawn next to the outdoor basketball court close to the Donner locker rooms, Gesling Stadium, and Weigand Gymnasium. All users must present a valid  CMU ID to use these facilities.  
6.18 CMU Alert  
www.cmu.edu/alert   
CMU Alert sends voice and/or text messages to registered phones in the event of a campus emergency that threatens public safety or during tests of the system in the spring and fall semesters. Students are automatically registered for CMU -Alert using the current contact 
information that has been entered into the Student Information Online (SIO): 
https://www.cmu.edu/hub/sio/about.html . 
 
 
  LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 40 
  
Appendix A  
2023 -2024  
Highlighted University Resources for Graduate Students  
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
  
 
Note: The following pages are meant to broadly include only some of the resources available to 
graduate students.  It is not an exhaustive appendix of resources, and students are strongly encouraged to visit the various websites linked below for the most u p-to-date information.   LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 41 
 A.1 Key Resources for Graduate Student Support  
A.1.1 Office of Graduate and Postdoctoral Affairs  
https://www.cmu.edu/graduate   graded@cmu.edu  
The Office of Graduate and Postdoctoral Affairs provides university -wide support for all graduate 
students and academic programs, with a focus on supporting graduate student success at 
Carnegie Mellon.  Examples of resources offered through the Office of Graduate and Postdoctoral 
Affairs include, but are not limited to:  
• Website with university resources, contact information for CMU 
programs and services, possible financial assistance and potential fundin g 
opportunities, and various procedural and policy information  
• Newsletter to all graduate students with information on activities, resources, and opportunities  
• Professional development seminars and workshops, and various programming and events for the gra duate student community  
•  
The Office of Graduate and Postdoctoral Affairs also works directly with the colleges and 
departments on issues related to graduate students and serve as a resource for developing policy 
and procedures.  The Office of Graduate and  Postdoctoral Affairs partners with many other offices 
and organizations, such as the Graduate Student Assembly, to support the holistic graduate 
student educational experience.  
A.1.2 Office of the Dean of Students  
https://www.cmu.edu/student- affairs/dean/   
The Office of the Dean of Students provides central leadership of the metacurricular experience 
at Carnegie Mellon including the coordination of student support.  Grad uate students will find 
the enrollment information for Domestic Partner Registration and Parental Accommodations in the Office of the Dean of Students or on their website. This Office also manages the Student 
Emergency Support Funding process. There are cu rrently three forms of support funding for 
enrolled students: emergency student loans, student parental loans, and the Tartan Emergency 
Support Fund. Inquiring students will be provided with additional information about the various 
types of funding during a consultation meeting with a member of the Dean of Students team. Tuition costs are not eligible for Student Emergency Support funding.  
College Liaisons and the Student Support Resources team serve as additional resources for 
graduate students. College Liaisons are senior members of the Division of Student Affairs who 
work with departments and colleges addressing student concerns across a wide range of issues. LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 42 
 College Liaisons are identified on the Important Contacts list in Student Information Online 
(SIO). The Student Support Resources team offers an additional level of support for students who 
are navigating a wide range of life events. Student Support Resources staff members work in partnership with campus and community resources to provide coordination of care and support 
appropriate to each student’s situation.  
A.1.3 The Division of  Student Affairs  
The Division of Student Affairs includes (not an exhaustive list):  
• Athletics, Physical Education and Recreation  
• Career and Professional Development Center (CPDC)  
• Center for Student Diversity and Inclusion  
• Cohon University Center  
• Counseling & Psychological Services (CaPS)  
• Dining Services  
• Office of Community Standards and Integrity (OCSI)  
• Office of Student Leade rship, Involvement, and Civic Engagement (SLICE) 
 
• University Health Services (UHS)  
• Wellness Initiatives  
A.1.4 Center for Student Diversity & Inclusion  
https://www.cmu.edu/student- diversity/   
Diversity and inclusion have a singular place among the values of Carnegie Mellon University. The 
Center for Student Diversity & Inclusion actively cultivates a strong, diverse and inclusive 
community capable of living out these values and advancing research, creativity, learning and development that changes the world.  
The Center offers resources to enhance an inclusive and transformative student experience in 
dimensions such as access, success, campus climate and intergroup dialog ue. Additionally, the 
Center supports and connects historically underrepresented students and those who are first in their family to attend college in a setting where students’ differences and talents are appreciated and reinforced, both at the graduate an d undergraduate level. Initiatives coordinated by the 
Center include, but are not limited to:  LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 43 
 • First generation/first in family to attend college programs 
• LGBTQ+ Initiatives  
• Race and ethnically focused programs, including Inter -University Graduate Student s of 
Color Series (SOC) and PhD SOC Network  
• Women’s empowerment programs, including Graduate Women’s 
Gatherings (GWGs)  
A.1.5 Assistance for Individuals with Disabilities  
https://www.cmu.edu/disability -resources/   
The Office of Disability Resources at Carnegie Mellon University has a continued mission to 
provide physical, digital, and programmatic access to ensure that students with disabilities have 
equal access to their educational experience.  The Office works to ensure that qualified individuals 
receive reasonable accommodations as guaranteed by the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) 
and Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973. Students who would like to receive 
accommodations can begin the process through Disability Resources' secure online portal or 
email access@andrew.cmu.edu to begin the interactive accommodation Process.  
Students with physical, sensory, cognitive, or emotional disabilities are encoura ged to self -
identify with the Office of Disability Resources and request needed accommodations. Any 
questions about the process can be directed to access@andrew.cmu.edu, or call (412) 268 - 6121.  
A.1.6 Eberly Center for Teaching Excellence & Educational Innovati on  
https://www.cmu.edu/teaching/   
The Eberly Center offers a wide variety of confidential, consultation services and professional 
development programs to support graduate students as teaching assistants or instructors of 
record during their time at Carnegie Mellon University and as future faculty members at other 
institutions. Regardless of one's current or future teaching context and duties, Eberly’s goal is to 
disseminate evidence- based teaching strategies in ways that are accessible and actionable. 
Programs and services include campus- wide Graduate Student Instructor Orientation events and 
our Future Faculty Program, both of which are designed to help participants be effectiv e and 
efficient in their teaching roles. The Eberly Center also assists departments in creating and 
conducting customized programs to meet the specific needs of their graduate student instructors. 
Specific information about Eberly Center support for graduate students is found at:  
https://www.cmu.edu/teaching/graduatestudentsupport/   
 LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 44 
 A.1.7 Graduate Student Assembly  
https://www.cmu.edu/stugov/gsa/   
The Graduate Student Assembly (GSA) is the branch of Carnegie Mellon Student Government 
that represents and advocates for the diverse interests of all graduate students at CMU. GSA is 
composed of representatives from the different graduate programs and departments who want to 
improve the graduate student experience at the different levels of the university. GSA is funded by the Student Activities Fee from all graduate students. GSA passes legislation, allocates student 
activities funding, advocates for legislative action locally and in Washington D.C. on behalf of 
graduate student issues and needs, and otherwise acts on behalf of all graduate student interests. 
GSA’s recent accomplishments are a testament to their making a difference, and steps to implementing the vision laid out by the strategic plan.  
https://www.cmu.edu/stugov/gsa/about- the-gsa/strategic -plan.html
  
GSA offers an expanding suite of social programming on and off -campus to bring graduate 
students from different departments together and build a sense of community. GSA is the host of the Graduate Student Lounge on the 3rd floor of the Cohon University Center. GSA also maintains 
a website of graduate student resources on and off -campus. GSA continues to rely on student 
feedback to improve the graduate student experience at CMU. Feel free to contact them at 
gsa@cmu.edu
 to get involved, stop by their office in the Cohon University Center Room 304 or 
become a representative for your department.  
A.1.8 Office of International Education (OIE)  
https://www.cmu.e du/oie/   
Carnegie Mellon hosts international graduate and undergraduate students who come from more than 90 countries. The Office of International Education (OIE) is the liaison to the University for 
all non -immigrant students and scholars, as well the repository for study abroad opportunities. 
OIE provides many services including: advising on personal, immigration, study abroad, academic, 
and social and acculturation issues; presenting programs of interest such as international career 
workshops, tax workshops, and cross- cultural and immigration workshops; international 
education and statistics on international students in the United States; posting pertinent information to students through email and the OIE website and conducting orientation and pre -
departure programs.  
A.1.9 Veterans and Military Community  
https://www.cmu.edu/veterans/   LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 45 
 Military veterans are a vital part of the Carnegie Mellon Uni versity community. Graduate 
students can find information on applying for veteran education benefits, campus services, 
veteran’s groups at CMU, and non -educational resources through the Veterans and Military 
Community website. There are also links and conn ections to veteran resource in the Pittsburgh 
community. The ROTC and Veteran Affairs Coordinator can be reached at  urovaedbenefits@andrew.cmu.edu
 or 412 -268-8747.  
A.1.10  Carnegie Mellon Ethics Hotline  
https://www.cmu.edu/hr/resources/ethics -hotline.html  
The health, safety and well- being of the university community are top priorities at Carnegie 
Mellon University. CMU provides a hotline that all members of the university community should use to confidentially report suspected unethical activity, violations of university policy, or 
violations of law. Students, faculty and  staff can anonymously file a report by calling 1 -844-587-
0793 or visiting  
https:// cmu.ethicspoint.com /. All submissions are reported to appropriate university 
personnel and handled discreetly.  
The hotline is NOT an emergency service. For emergencies, call University 
Police at 412- 268- 2323.  
A.1.11  Policy Against Retaliation  
It is the policy of Carnegie Mellon University to protect from retaliation any individual who 
makes a good faith report of a suspected violation of any applicable law or regulation, university 
Policy or procedure, any contractual obligation of the university,  and any report made pursuant 
to the Carnegie Mellon University Code of Business Ethics and Conduct.  
Additional details regarding the Policy Against Retaliation are available at:  
 https://www.cmu.edu/policies/administrative -and-governance/whistleblower.html   
A.2 Key Offices for Academic & Research Support  
A.2.1 Computing and Information Resources  
https://www.cmu.edu/computing/   
Computing Services maintains and supports computing resources for the campus community, 
including the campus wired and wireless networks, printing, computer labs, file storage, email 
and software catalog. As members of this community, we are all responsible for the security of 
these shared resources. Be sure to review the Safe Computing 
(https://www.cmu.edu/computing/safe/ ) section and the University Computing Policy LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 46 
 (https://www.cmu.edu/policies/information -technology/comput ing.html )  
Visit the Computing Services website ( https://www.cmu.edu/computing/ ) to learn more. For 
assistance the Computing Services Help Center is available at 412 -268-4357 (HELP) or 
ithelp@cmu.edu .  
A.2.2  Student Academic Success Center  
https://www.cmu.edu/student- success/  
The Student Academic Success Center’s (SASC) work to support success focuses on creating 
spaces for students to engage in their coursework and  approach to learning through many group 
and individual program options.  SASC supports student success by providing academic coaching, 
subject -specific tutoring, effective communication strategies, accommodations for students with 
disabilities, and language support for multilingual learners. SASC engages with faculty and staff 
to improve the coordination and professional development for academic advisors. Visit the SASC 
website for more information about services offered in areas such as communication and language 
support; language and cross- cultural support; and learning support.   
A.2.3  University Libraries  
https://www.library.cmu.edu/  
The University Libraries offers a wide range of information, resources, and services supporting 
graduate students in coursework, research, teaching, and publishing. The library licenses and 
purchases books, journals, media, and other needed materials in various formats. Library 
liaisons, consultants, and information specialists provide in -depth and professional assistance 
and advice in all -things information, including:  
• Locating and obtaining specific resources 
• Providing specialized research support  
• Advanced training in the use and management of data 
Sign up for workshops and hands- on topic- specific sessions such as data visualization with 
Tableau, cleaning data with OpenRefine, and getting started with Zotero. Weekly drop -in hours 
for Digital Humanities and for Research Data Research Management are sched uled during the 
academic year. Start at the library home page to find the books, journals, and databases you need; to identify and reach out to the library liaison in your field; to sign up for scheduled workshops; 
and to connect with consultants in scholarly publishing, research data management, and digital LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 47 
 humanities.  
A.2.4  Research at CMU  
https://www.cmu.edu/research/   
The primary purpose of research at the university is the advancement of knowledge in all fields in 
which the university is active. Research is regarded as one of the university’s major contributions 
to society and as an  essential element in education, particularly at the graduate level and in faculty 
development. Research activities are governed by several university policies. Guidance and more 
general information are found by visiting the Research at Carnegie Mellon website.  
A.2.5  Office of Research Integrity & Compliance  
https://www.cmu.edu/research- compliance/   
The Office of Research Integrity & Compliance (ORIC) is designed to support research at 
Carnegie Mellon University. The staff work with researchers to ensure research is conducted with 
integrity and in accordance with federal and Pennsylvania regulation. ORIC assists researchers 
with human subject research, conflicts of in terest, responsible conduct of research, export 
controls, and institutional animal care & use. ORIC also provides consultation,  advice, and review 
of allegations of research misconduct.  
A.3 Key Offices for Health, Wellness & Safety  
A.3.1 Counseling & Psychological  Services  
https://www.cmu.edu/counseling/   
Counseling & Psychological Services (CaPS) affords the opportunity for students to talk privately 
about academic and personal concerns in a safe, confidential setting. An initial consultation at 
CaPS can help clarify the nature of the concern, provide immediate support, and explore further 
options if needed. These may include a referral for counseling within CaPS, to another resource at Carnegie Mellon, or to another resource within the larger Pittsburgh community. CaPS also 
provides workshops and group sessions on mental health related topics specifically for graduate 
students on campus. CaPS services are provided at no cost. Appointments can be made in person, 
or by telephone at 412 -268-2922.  
A.3.2  Health Services  
https://www.cmu.edu/HealthServices/   LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 48 
 University Health Services (UHS) is staffed by physicians, advanced practice clinicians and 
registered nurses who provide general medical care, allergy injections, first aid, gynecological care, 
and contraception as well as on -site pharmaceuticals. The CMU Student Insurance Plan covers 
most visit fees to see the physicians and advanced practice clinicians & nurse visits. Fees for prescription medications, laboratory tests, diagnostic procedures and referral to the emergency 
room or specialists are the student’s responsibility and students should review the UHS website 
and their insurance plan for detailed information about the university health insurance requirement and fees.  
UHS also has a registered dietician and health promotion specialists on staff to assist students in 
addressing nutrition, drug and alcohol and other healthy lifestyle issues. In addition to providing 
direct health care, UHS administers the Student Health Insurance Program. The Student Health 
Insurance plan offers a high level of coverage in a wide network of health care providers and hospit als. Appointments can be made by visiting UHS’s website, walk -in, or by telephone, 412 -
268-2157.  
A.3.3  Campus Wellness  
https://www.cmu.edu/wellness/   
At Carnegie Mellon, we believe our individual and collective well- being is rooted in healthy 
connections to each other and to campus resources. The university provides a wide variety of 
wellness, mindfulness and connectedness initiatives and resources designed to help students thrive in side and outside the classroom.  
A.3.4  Religious and Spiritual Life Initiatives (RSLI)  
https://www.cmu.edu/wellbeing/resources/religious -spiritual/index.html  
Carnegie Mellon is committed to the holistic growth of our students, including creating 
opportunities for spiritual and religious practice and exploration. RSLI has relationships with 
local houses of worship from various traditions and many of these groups are members of CMU’s 
Council of Religious Advisors. They also offer programs and initiatives that cross traditional religious boundaries in order to increase knowledge of and appreciation for the full diversity of 
the worldview traditions. RSLI staff are available to support students across the spectrum of religious and spiritual practice and would be more than happy to help you make a connection into 
a community of faith during your time at CMU.  
A.3.5  University Police  
https://www.cmu.edu/police/   x2323  LTI Ph.D.  Graduate Student Handbook  Page 49 
 The University Police Department is located at 4551 Filmore  Street . The department’s services 
include police patrols and call response, criminal investigations, fixed officer and foot officer 
patrols, event security, and crime prevention and education programming as well as bicycle and 
laptop registration. Visit the department’s website for additional information about the staff, 
emergency phone locations, crime prevention, lost and found, fingerprint services, and annual 
statistic reports. Carnegie Mellon University publishes an annual campus security and fire safety report describing the university’s security, alcohol and drug, sexual assault, and fire safety 
policies.  The report also contains statistics about the number and type of crimes committed on the campus and the number and cause of fires in campus residence facilities during the preceding 
three years. Graduate students can obtain  a copy by contacting the University Police Department 
at x2323.  The annual security and fire safety report is also available online at:  
https://www.cmu.edu/police/annualreports/   
A.3.6  Shuttle and Escort Services  
https://www.cmu.edu/parking/transport/  
Parking and Transportation coordinates the Shuttle Service and Escort Service provided for CMU 
students, faculty, and community. The Shuttle & Escort website has full information about these 
services, stops, routes, tracking and schedules.  
A.4 The WORD  
https://www.cmu.edu/student- affairs/theword/  
The WORD is Carnegie Mellon University’s online student handbook and serves as the 
foundation for the department (and so metimes college) handbook. The WORD contains 
university -wide academic policy information and resources, community policies and resources, 
and describes the university level procedures used to review possible violations of these 
standards. It is designed to provide all students with the tools, guidance, and insights to help you 
achieve your full potential as a member of the Carnegie Mellon community. Graduate students are 
encouraged to bookmark this site and refer to it often. University policies can also be  found in full 
text at: https://www.cmu.edu/policies/ . 
 
Carnegie Mellon University has been a birthplace 
of innovation since its founding in 1900.
Today, CMU is a global leader bringing groundbreaking 
ideas to market and creating successful startup 
businesses. Our award-winning faculty are renowned for 
working closely with students to solve major scientific, 
technological and societal challenges. We put a strong 
emphasis on creating things — from art to robots. We 
have become a model for economic development in 
forming partnerships with companies such as Uber, 
Google and Disney. Our students are recruited by some 
of the world’s most innovative companies.
MANAGEMENT 
INFORMATION 
SYSTEMS
U.S. News & World Report, 2022#1
ARTIFICIAL 
INTELLIGENCE
U.S. News & World Report, 2022#1
AMONG U.S.  
UNIVERSITIES
Times Higher Education  
World University 
Ranking, 2023#19SOFTWARE 
ENGINEERING
U.S. News & World Report, 2022COLLEGE OF 
ENGINEERING
U.S. News & World Report, 2022#1 #4#1SCHOOL OF 
COMPUTER 
SCIENCE
U.S. News & World Report, 2022
UNIVERSITY  
IN THE WORLD
Times Higher Education  
World University  
Ranking, 2023#28TIME-BASED/  
NEW MEDIA
U.S. News & World Report, 2019#11,529  
FACULTY16,779  
STUDENTSGraduate
Undergraduate
117,257 
ALUMNI (LIVING)
85%  U.S. 15%  International35%  U.S. 65%  International
76%  U.S. 24%  InternationalGLOBAL COMMUNITY
Students representing
126 countries
Faculty representing
56 countries
Alumni representing 
148 countries
OF COMPUTER 
SCIENCE’S FIRST-
YEAR STUDENTS  
WERE WOMEN  
IN 2019
Nearly triple the  
national average“ My Heart is in the Work. ”  
 Andrew Carnegie, Founder  
 November 15, 1900
49.8 %
87%  U.S. 13%  InternationalSCHOOLS AND COLLEGES
College of Engineering 
College of Fine Arts
Dietrich College of Humanities  
and Social Sciences
Heinz College of Information Systems 
and Public Policy
Mellon College of Science
School of Computer Science
Tepper School of Business
cmu.edu/assets/pdfs/cmu-fact-sheet.pdf    |   cmu.edu/about/awards.htmlMarch 2020BIG IDEAS THAT SHAPE YOUR WORLD START HERE
1,000+ companies greenlighted 
across the U.S. and internationally 
Cognitive tutors,  which improve 
the math skills of 500,000+ 
students each year 
The first U.S. school to award  
a degree in drama  in 1914
James Gosling (SCS 1983) 
invented the Java computer 
programming language .
The first exclusive higher 
education partner of the Tony 
Awards® , co-creating the first, 
national recognition program 
honoring K-12 theatre educators The first smile in an email , created 
in 1982 by professor Scott Fahlman
Kevlar Fiber , invented by alumna 
Stephanie Kwolek (MM 1946)
The Last Lecture , written  
by alumni Randy Pausch (SCS 1988)  
and Jeffrey Zaslow (DC 1980)
In 1919, CMU’s first Ph.D.  was 
awarded to Mao Yisheng, father  
of Chinese bridge construction. 
Duolingo , invented by professor  
Luis von Ahn (CS 2003, 2005), had  
10 million downloads in 12 months 
and was named Apple’s 2013 app  
of the year.
:-)
LEADERSHIP
Farnam Jahanian   
President
David Coulter  
Chair, Board of Trustees
James H. Garrett Jr.  
Provost2 National Academy of Engineering       3 National Academy of Sciences        4 National Academy of Medicine
 Won by alumni and current/former faculty
The leading university center 
for cybersecurity , providing 
support to more than 110 
centers around the world 
The world’s first university 
robotics department ,  
founded in 1979
Alumnus Andy Warhol   
(CFA1949), pop artist pioneer  
and cultural icon
One of only 29 universities  
invited to be a member of the 
World Economic Forum’s 
Global University  
Leaders Forum
CMU.EDU
ECONOMIC IMPACT
• Attracting major companies  —  
including Google, Intel, Uber and GE —  
to locate operations and create new  
jobs in Pittsburgh
• To date, the CMU community has 
launched more than 400 startups  
and created more than 152 spinoff 
companies .
• Contributing to the cultural and civic life of  
the city with performances , exhibitions  
and research collaborations
13
ACADEMY  
AWARDS65
MEMBERS  
OF NAE2
146
EMMY  
AWARDS20
MEMBERS  
OF NAS3
6
MEMBERS  
OF NAM4
13
TURING  
AWARDS
20
NOBEL  
LAUREATES
58
TONY  
AWARDS
May 2023
